
--------------------------------------------------------
bad camera  -129
camera is between average and good.
However  front camera is better.
Camera good satisfactory not like wow liye light quality poor 
First of all touch of the device is smooth like butter performance is good  Camera in low light is very poor but Now Power button of my device is not working properly.
2  Front camera is average  again xiaomi wins race with this perspective.
Camera  It is good but not like zenfone2 or mi4 4i
Heating problem Heating Like Hell  camera quality is not good  some black line is reflecting on screen in sun light or light.
Camera is awesome in outdoor  but in indoor comparatively low but very good  Front camera is also very good.
phone performance is good camera is good over all battery backup is not good if you are playing some games display is good .
But front camera is nice.
good rear and front camera quality.
both rear   front camera provide good sharp images.
Camera quality also average 
The camera has been bumped up and the output image quality is good if not great.
Front camera is average.
 Excellent features good battery back and front camera both are very good 
but the best part is the front camera .
 Front camera is not as good
Phone is very good  camera quality is awesome  no heating problem even after playing high end games  speaker is too good.
 I like it  Good screen but low camera quality in night mode and some times it may get worst qualoty pictures.
Such an awesome phone  very cost effective   camera is way too good that she never stops clickin   
11. front camera awsome and wide angle lens
But front camera is Average.
very good performance laz free battery backup is good camera is not that good its medium quality.
One more thing that replacement product camera quality is very poor.
Except Camera   water resistance quality other parameters are available in lots of phone available at cheaper rate.
1. camera is not good for 13 mega pixl  in day light its good but in low light bad 
 I am not going by the good camera  other software feature that are really one of the best in the class.
Camera 7 10  Due to average low light quality  
I am using it for over a month  and I have no complains against it  though at night the camera is not so good.
very nice Interface with real google Experience  Speed is Good  I Installed 35 apps without any hang  Looking Good  Display Good  overall size of the phone is very comfortable  Camera clarity is awesome in both Front and Rear cameras 
So you can understand the quality of back camera.
Pros  Leaving aside the mess which is called Lollipop and what it did to the Moto UI  from Kitkat  the phone is a powerhouse  It has a good quad core processor  Super 2GB RAM  13 MP back and 5 MP front camera  dual flash  water resistance  4g LTE which are some noticeable feature from its predecessor Moto G2.
Camera quality is good  but best get another camera app
Good camera and overall is light compared to most of the phones.
5mp front camera is impressive but 13mp camera is average camera 6 10 
The front camera like a VGA Camera and the rear camera like a ordinary china phone camera.
camera quality is too good both front and back. 
only one thing is that phone rear camera is not good its to low quality it is not 13 mp its is like 8 mp.
Camera quality is poor in low light.
The only thing is that while taking pic from front camera it takes a little time but its tolerable The video can be shoot at 1080p.
But no flash light in front camera like Samsung J5 J7.
rear camera quality is not bad  front is also fine.
Rear camera is awesome photos clicked from rear camera is too much impressive The photo quality of rear camera even in low light condition is quite good.
Camera 8 10  average quality.
nice cameras especially the front camera.
 Good Camera quality if u are not use to DSLR frames.
front camera is ok.
Rear camera of 13 MP is Okay and front camera of 5MP does its great job.
Camera quality also not good 
Camera  both front   back  are really good and you can capture nice photos.
Camera Quality is good but not mind Blowing.
Rear camera is good but front is not that great extra one point for the slow motion feature that is a plus point 
The only problem I observed is the clarity of the photos  not a very good camera.
5 10  back 9 10 front 10 10  I am vry much satisfied with the camera that it offers for this price.
Phone comes with 2gb ram  so no hanging problem even large games can play with ease but camera quality is not so good.
3  Mindblowing front camera even in low light and awesome rear camera because with Dual smart flash it makes the pic more realistic  Camera 10 10  
Camera was never a strong point for Moto G  but 3rd Gen has much better camera than 1st or 2nd Gen. Plus point is that  flash is very much powerful  hence  photos captured in dark are reasonably good.
Camera   Not so good  I own a lumia 720 and it produces far better image quality than this  I also update the Motorola Camera App but still the quality was same 
front camera too okay only.
Camera quality is low.
I was not recommended to anyone to buy this product  because product look not good   camera also as compare to sony   samsung Moto G 3rd very Bad  simple android inbuilt App.
this is the best phone i never seen  best camera quality  best picture quality and speed is also very good.
The camera feature is good specially the rear one is excellent but the front one is normal.
I can t say anything about camera  just superb but if you have used any higher camera then you will think it s not good but 13MP  5MP is excellent
As i buy moto g  3rd generation  because of 13 mega pixcel camera but camera is not good.
Camera quality is good  not awesome  in indoors and AWESOME in outdoors with sunlight.
picture quality is awesome both in primary and secondary camera.
Camera quality as bad or as good as 8 mp phones
It is a very good phone  no overheating  average battery life  support high level games  but if you are looking for a phone having a very good camera quality  just DO NOT go for it.
Camera is just too good  front as well as the main.
I ordered a Moto G3 mobile and it got delivered before mentioned time but I did not find the camera good with respect to other brands and I requested for return just after 30mins of delivery.
Camera Quality is very low.
Camera is good  not best  shots in the dark are bad.
 but front camera is good 
user friendly and the camera quality is too good.
 Good mobile but poor camera.
I am not mentioned more abt Camera vdo recording and sound quality bcz it is not mandatory part if u want u can chk it on google or youtube.
Amazing Camera front and back quality.
camera is not good    
suggest you to not buy this if you are thinking to buy good camera phone.
Camera is also good both front and back and work fine also low light with flash  Many person gives on their review camera is not good but its average  
The camera is good  especially the front camera.
Camera Quality is Average if you capture at 13 MP screen get synchronize.
Just bought Moto G3 yesterday  its very cool and stylish  back panel very nice to grip  camera quality is too good 13MP and 5MP.
 Front Camera is good and back camera is good in daylight but its quite blurred in low light.
Front camera is ok not good but rear worst camera I have ever used.awesome camera  185
camera is between average and good.
The pictures that are taken even in low light conditions and in artificial light conditions with rear camera are very good .
Mobiles also good performance camera fantastic But suddenly heating problem.
and camera is so good.
Good camera 
8 Camera quality is okay  3 5   
Camera quality is good.
 Very good phone  great feature  good camera front   rear camera is good  
  Rear Camera could have been better
Camera is awesome in outdoor  but in indoor comparatively low but very good  Front camera is also very good.
But front camera is nice.
good rear and front camera quality.
both rear   front camera provide good sharp images.
The camera quality is awesome.
Camera is damn good  especially in terms of shutter speed
A reliable phone by Motorola with good RAM and pretty fine camera.
Superb build quality  nice design  both cameras do good job  Android 5.
Good quality camera and good build body.
front camera too okay only.
Camera good satisfactory not like wow liye light quality poor 
23 GB free  Very good front and main Camera performance in normal and low light condition  good sound quality and fidelity.
Camera is super fast so far  and the twisting gesture to open camera and same feature to switch between front and back camera is very useful.
Moto G3 because of better optical utilization and better low light pictures but j5 has a better front camera
good camera front and rear 
Its camera quality is awesome.
 camera is very good 
stock android experience very handy  nice camera with dual led tone flash light speaker and earphn both are in front gorilla glass and water resistence.
 Product was good and as per my expectations and camera Is good 
 Camera is very good quality and over all good some battery problem is here but other wise good 
for those who are having issues with camera   actually the camera is good but it just need a software update of camera application   no issues in the h w 
 Nice phone good camera good speed and water proof also in this phone speedy delivery thanks to flipkart  
 Very good product found no issue in the phone very good camera 
Good camera and best screen features and processor.
Camera is good.
Rear and Front Camera is also good.
 I am not going by the good camera  other software feature that are really one of the best in the class.
Front camera is great and give good selfies.
Camera is very good  although there is some blurry photos if you take photos at night.
good camera quality
At this price range  The camera is very good.
Nice Phone with attractive look  camera quality is perfect.
Good camera and overall is light compared to most of the phones.
Camera is good  remaing specifications are ok 
 2. camera good in day light but noisy in artificial light.
5mp front camera is impressive but 13mp camera is average camera 6 10 
Finally motorola use a good camera module for the budget line phones.
the phone is great   camera  performance   build quality and every thing 
Lil disappointed with poor camera quality  No LED Notification light.
it s just wow  Camera quality is good but I compared with Mi4i which my brother is already using and the image quality is slightly better in Mi.
Also  although the front camera does not have a flash  still when you put the flash on and click  the screen flashes and the camera takes in as much light as possible.
fantastic camera both rear and front   good option for selfie too.
Good camera quality both front and rear.
Camera front 5 mp   rear 13 mp with dual tone LED flash  both camera s gives u high quality pictures   joy of clicking.
The pic captured from front camera is quite impressive.
Good Camera Quality.
only one thing is that phone rear camera is not good its to low quality it is not 13 mp its is like 8 mp.
Good Camera with Good Light.
The camera is good   I like the fact that I can use the volume key as the camera button   clicks a pretty good picture as well
The camera is average  it does its job but dont expect it to be as good as Mi4i camera.
Camera Quality is good.
Good build quality  great camera  nice looks.
Camera is of very good quality.
One lag in phone is in camera although camera quality is good but it gives over.
Motorola has seriously work on many area of this Phone  Camera is good   Build Quality is fine expecting Metal Body  P .
rear camera quality is not bad  front is also fine.
The camera is high quality though the front camera could ve been better.
But the most important thing is its front camera which is just 5 MP and gives outstanding quality of picture.
front camera is ok.
camera was good but I expected higher than which I got overall good camera and low light photos are good but getting heat when we use huge .
The design is sturdy  display is great though it is 720p  with the advantage it doesn t kill your battery like the 1020p s  call quality is good  camera is great.
camera quality is truly amazing.
4  Camera is Excellent  even low light photographs come out very good
Plus the camera is of high quality.
Camera  both front   back  are really good and you can capture nice photos.
camera quality is good.
Rear camera is good but front is not that great extra one point for the slow motion feature that is a plus point 
5 10  back 9 10 front 10 10  I am vry much satisfied with the camera that it offers for this price.
Anyway  the phone has a very good camera at 13 MP and a nice front camera at 5 MP.
3  Mindblowing front camera even in low light and awesome rear camera because with Dual smart flash it makes the pic more realistic  Camera 10 10  
Good camera but low voices 
3. rear vs front camera is also great.
 Although configuration is good but purchase it only if you don t need front camera as front camera of this phone does not work.
Camera   Not so good  I own a lumia 720 and it produces far better image quality than this  I also update the Motorola Camera App but still the quality was same 
Camera is absolutely fine both front and back.
spl the camera quality is awesome and it comes in such a good price .
4  The camera quality is good.
3  Good Camera and Better battery life than the past generation.
Camera lens is of nexus 6  so quality of camera is quite good in full light conditions.
Camera  Front camera is excellent  back camera is excellent in well.
2  Good Camera
The camera feature is good specially the rear one is excellent but the front one is normal.
6 Camera looks good for me.
Now i have some doubt or question about the camera  buts its good in outdoor daylight.
Camera quality is too poor .
Good camera
The image quality of my moto e us better than the primary camera.
awesome camera quality.
picture quality is awesome both in primary and secondary camera.
5  GOOD CAMERA
p. s  use google camera for good wide selfies.
it s having good camera clarity.
speakers are good  the processor is good  camera is good.
All the above are quite good in certain aspect s. Some has good display  good camera  good processor good sound  good UI  good looks  good grip  perfect screen size  good ram management.
But build quality  screen quality  sound quality and camera quality all good.
Both the front and rear camera quality is great.
Camera Good
camera is good
Camera quality is good and they gave Slow motion video feature as in Iphone that is more than awesomeee  5 5
 i am using this phone since 15 days it is good smart phine under 15k camera is good 
Camera is very good for this price range compared to my previous Micromax Canvas HD A116.
Cons  Internal memory of 16 GB only  Phone Body built quality is like average  Accessories quality are compromised  like a cheap headphone  charger is just so so and desi in quality  Limited color option  only black and white  and no customization option in India  like the same phone customization option is available in USA  Quality of Camera and Speaker Sound for listening Song etc could have been improved  though phone speaker is great for talking and other voice activity .
Front camera is decent too.
its camera quality is excellent as well as performance .
So the camera quality is excellent.
Camera Is Good  
 but front camera is good 
Camera quality is very good.
  Front camera can take good quality images
Overall Nice phone with nice Camera quality.
Rear camera is very good.
Flash quality is good  For both side camera .
its camera is good and performance is also good.
1. camera quality is too poor.
The camera is good  especially the front camera.
Camera  The rear camera is very good with sharp pictures and natural colours and much improved over the previous gen.
Very Nice front Camera.
Camera is pretty good.
Camera quality is perfect.
Camera quality is awesome  I have a DSLR and sometime I wonder Why I spend 50K on DSLR.
 Good enough specs  better camera and battery lasting a whole day.
Pros  good camera  good call quality 
Camera is just awesome 13mp rear with dual flash n 5mp front is gud in light in dark it s low .
It is 13MP at day time  8MP at night time  P Front camera is great.
 Front Camera is good and back camera is good in daylight but its quite blurred in low light.
 Excellent features good battery back and front camera both are very good 
Front camera is ok not good but rear worst camera I have ever used.
--------------------------------------------------------
bad_sound  -49
Loudspeaker  8 10  Compare to G2 the sound is low but its fairly loud though it a single speaker handset came along with the phone is average tested it with Cx180 and i must say the sound quality is awesome  
 Headphones provided are not having good sound quality and not easily wearable.
7. call quality was good .
Great build quality  low price  good battery life  good picture quality overall I am impressed 
Sound   it does not have stereo speakers but the sound is crisp and loud.
2  Aweful headphones  and phone sound quality is average  even with better headphones 
The phone built quality is good  good speaker  primary camara is average nothing great  secondary camara is good  selfie lovers advantage  battery back up is okay usually all phones are the same.
Accessories  You get an earphone  which is of good quality  but not in.
But still  the sound quality is good   loud  very loud .
Only thing that there is no touch sound when i type text or very low sound on other place toches .
7  build quality is so good so u keep holding to it and never drop on the floor. 
user friendly and the camera quality is too good.
Camera quality is good  but best get another camera app
I am not mentioned more abt Camera vdo recording and sound quality bcz it is not mandatory part if u want u can chk it on google or youtube.
Camera quality also not good 
8. speaker sound quality very good and loud.
Sound quality is too good  5 stars for sound.
Phone is very good  camera quality is awesome  no heating problem even after playing high end games  speaker is too good.
12 Head phone provided with phone is not good quality .
The camera has been bumped up and the output image quality is good if not great.
720p recording has no sound  thats bad.
Phone comes with 2gb ram  so no hanging problem even large games can play with ease but camera quality is not so good.
Music quality not so good even with senniser headphones.
but speaker quality is not good.
 I have received phone it is of good quality and features you can go for it but as they are mentioning offer for 3G and 4G connnection it is not there 
Camera Quality is good but not mind Blowing.
7. headphone sound quality bad 
10. call quality is good 
this is the best phone i never seen  best camera quality  best picture quality and speed is also very good.
texture done is not of good quality.
sound quality is very low.
Just bought Moto G3 yesterday  its very cool and stylish  back panel very nice to grip  camera quality is too good 13MP and 5MP.
Camera quality is good  not awesome  in indoors and AWESOME in outdoors with sunlight.
Heating problem Heating Like Hell  camera quality is not good  some black line is reflecting on screen in sun light or light.
5  Good design and grip for holding phone in your hands  superb call quality.
I wish I could say the same about the earphones  they are flimsy   have a poor sound quality.
Music quality at is not good.
Camera quality as bad or as good as 8 mp phones
7 Sound quality is good not very good .
Seems to be good  little less sound to others.
Build quality is very good   material used is of good quality and good finishing  slim piece  back cover is attractive as well as designed such as it maintains grip in the hand. 
Good Phone folks  at the price with long lasting build and good quality  hard to find.good sound  104
Camera good satisfactory not like wow liye light quality poor 
Built quality is very good.
Camera quality is good.
But still  the sound quality is good   loud  very loud .
7 Except this  awesome build quality   5 inch screen is good to hold also fits good in pocket .
Picture quality is very good.
Also the picture quality is very good.
Sound quality is superb.
Good Sound Quality.
Sound quality was pretty good and clear.
Superb build quality  nice design  both cameras do good job  Android 5.
Good quality camera and good build body.
Call quality is good.
Speakers have good quality of sound  the speaker is at front side  so watching youtube videos is good experience on this phone.
pucture clearity is good  touch system also good   sound system also 
Phone sound is good and loudy because of its speaker position in front 
Camara quality is also good.
 Camera is very good quality and over all good some battery problem is here but other wise good 
Loudspeaker  8 10  Compare to G2 the sound is low but its fairly loud though it a single speaker handset came along with the phone is average tested it with Cx180 and i must say the sound quality is awesome  
14 Charger provided with this is a very good quality .
good in sound
Due to that when I call someone  ring sound is very horrible and i cant able to keep the mobile close to my ear.
Call quality is also good
only disappointing point is the speaker sound is too low as it a single firing speaker  but overall a nice product at rs 10000 pricing should have been around 8500 .
8  Sound Quality is nice  
I was using a good quality tempered glass as well with this phone but still the screen got cracked and the tempered glass was fine.
Sound Quality is good 
Sound is superb.
I will dare to compare the sound quality with iPhone  though some people may disagree.
6  voice quality is good
  sound quality 9 10
  Audio output is comparable to ipod with a good quality headset
 If you need a phone that has a good build quality  stable and where the hardware has a perfect match with the software go with Moto G3.
only one thing is that phone rear camera is not good its to low quality it is not 13 mp its is like 8 mp.
4  Sound quality is good  4 5  
8 Display quality is good.
Flash quality is good  For both side camera .
Camera Quality is good.
10 Call Quality is very good .
Good build quality  great camera  nice looks.
Sound quality is gud too.
Sound quality in music player is good  try with some sony Headphone  5 5  
Motorola has seriously work on many area of this Phone  Camera is good   Build Quality is fine expecting Metal Body  P .
sound is not sufficient for playing songs.
video quality is good
Camera quality is good and they gave Slow motion video feature as in Iphone that is more than awesomeee  5 5
Only thing that there is no touch sound when i type text or very low sound on other place toches .
it s just wow  Camera quality is good but I compared with Mi4i which my brother is already using and the image quality is slightly better in Mi.
Call quality is pretty good.
we expect a good quality from a MNC like MOTOROLLA
camera quality is good.
Sound  Sound is very loud and clear although not as much pleasing.
This good enough in quality.
Sound   it does not have stereo speakers but the sound is crisp and loud.
sound quality awesome because giving two speakers in front.
7  Audio quality is good 
Camera   Not so good  I own a lumia 720 and it produces far better image quality than this  I also update the Motorola Camera App but still the quality was same 
its feel u have i phone 6  premium build quality   good battery backup  nice display  white colour are so premium.
spl the camera quality is awesome and it comes in such a good price .
4  The camera quality is good.
Good quality.
Good sound quality and camera.
10. call quality is good 
Sound quality is good.
 Call Quality  Signal reception is excellent  call quality is very good.
4G Solid build quality and good looking
Cons  Internal memory of 16 GB only  Phone Body built quality is like average  Accessories quality are compromised  like a cheap headphone  charger is just so so and desi in quality  Limited color option  only black and white  and no customization option in India  like the same phone customization option is available in USA  Quality of Camera and Speaker Sound for listening Song etc could have been improved  though phone speaker is great for talking and other voice activity .
Display  The display is sharp and crisp  colours are vibrant and although has less and outdated resolution  1280X720  the screen quality is very good.
One lag in phone is in camera although camera quality is good but it gives over.
All the above are quite good in certain aspect s. Some has good display  good camera  good processor good sound  good UI  good looks  good grip  perfect screen size  good ram management.
But build quality  screen quality  sound quality and camera quality all good.
7. call quality was good .
Call sound quality is crisp and clear
Audio quality is good but its little bit lesser in volume while running in loud speaker.
Call   Voice Quality and Sound Quality very good  basic function of the phone  needs to be good.
sound quality is fine
Camera is of very good quality.
sound is also good
  Front camera can take good quality images
Speaker sound is also good and clearly audible when phone is in pocket.
8. speaker sound quality very good and loud.
audio quality good
Flipkart delivery was amazing  The UI is smooth  games run without any lags  sound quality is fine although the in.
Audio and Video quality is very good
Awesome battery life  easy to grip  good sound quality.
Build Quality   5 5  Really good  
sound quality is very low.
99 philips earphone has better sound quality than this.
Audio  Call quality is good.
Camera quality is very good.
Sound is good.
 Good quality product and well affordable in range and most trust able brand as well 
Good Phone folks  at the price with long lasting build and good quality  hard to find.
Good one value for money  performance is good photo quality is good
--------------------------------------------------------
worst battery  -35
Battery seems to last for good 10 hours with mobile data or wifi on 
 Over Heating and Not So Good Battery Life.
The Battery is non removable.
but battery backup is everage not good and not bad.
Battery life is very low.
Zenfone 2 with 3000 mAh battery struggles to last a day in real life.
Very Average Product  Battery Not good  Not Properly Tested  Performance like Micromax Phones.
I am wondering how motorola producing this type products  Not good battery and heating issue.
Good battery back up came upto 8 Hrs with mobile data and 12 Hrs with Wifi and if you dont use internet I guess it will sustain more than a day
not good battery.
4. battery backup is good  not applicable for heavy user 
phone performance is good camera is good over all battery backup is not good if you are playing some games display is good .
Battery life is too good.
 Battery  The 2450mAh battery is carrying me through the day with a mixed usage  again  I am not a heavy gamer  but the battery seems to be quite good.
8 months now and battery life is good 
Average battery life 
Second phone which got started hanging issue If i use any application display goes blank and nothing will respond  this is non removable battery henceforth we have to wait until phone gets responding.
4. battery life is too good it works whole day without charging.
 Battery is not good.
apart from hardware issues battery is not good for heavy work like gaming or video songs.
6 Battery is non removable .
Having a phone with stellar battery life  please note that these review was done in a single go.
but battery is not good 
Battery life is not good
what i liked the most is battery life  its freaking awesome  i could a screen on time of almost 7.
Pros  1  Way better battery life than other android phones.
 Very very poor battery life.
But in real life user experience you will say its very good.
I wont go into ros n cons but will tell you this  if you want a budget phone with decent battery life and the capacity to work like a sportscar  look no further.
then the battery back up is too good.
Battery is good  However  it will drain out easily since the display is not so good and you need to keep the brightness at a higher level.
 good mobile under 10k nice mobile but lagging at some times nice battery poor processor but water and dust proof gaurenteed  nice battery  93
Sound quality and battery backup is also good.
Being a 2470mah battery  it is doing good.
Battery backup is pretty good.
battery is good
and the disappointing part is that there are not any authorized service centre of motorola in Jamshedpur which is making my life even more difficult.
4  2470mAh Battery with good battery backup
really its very attractive and very good with battery backup.
I upgraded from LG L90 which is also a good phone with really good battery backup up to 40 hours with moderate usage.
Battery drain   its a huge problem  keeping in mind that its competitors Samsung J7  Xi Mi 4  Zenforce All of them has considerably large battery life s. 2.
6 Battery is non removable .
Great build quality  low price  good battery life  good picture quality overall I am impressed 
but battery backup is everage not good and not bad.
Front Camera hangs while taking a picture  Battery backup is good.
Phone performs a beast and the battery life is awesome.
Good Battery Life
2  Gestures and accelorameter   proximity sensor screen unlock makes your life more easy.
the battery is good 
battery backup is pretty good depending upon usage
 Amazing mobile in this price range  2GB ram and excellent battery life.
Battery life is good.
Good battery performance.
 Its good and having some better apps it has good battery capcity  
Battery back up is very good .
Battery Backup is Good it comes for whole day even after using Internet 4G voice call etc.
Awesome battery life  easy to grip  good sound quality.
removable battery life.
Battery is also good.
Battery life is good  can last for two days with my form of average usage  few calls  mails  WhatsApp  3G is always on  an hour or two of light gaming  few snaps and social networking roughly 2.
I recommend this phone who want good battery life  display  internet usage and music.
good battery backup.
Battery backup is very good  compared to my previous phone star pro  but its really good  a wonderful 2 GB RAM  very good processor.
8 months now and battery life is good 
Second phone which got started hanging issue If i use any application display goes blank and nothing will respond  this is non removable battery henceforth we have to wait until phone gets responding.
After updating to mash mallow battery drains very fast some times for normal use we want to charge twice a day lags and hangs friend camara is not good phone heats up quickly inclding display only one advantage is displsy is fantastic
but ya if you want a phone with good battery life and decent display you should buy this.
Battery backup is very good  it almost gives a whole day backup with wifi 3G on and normal usage.
Battery is very good.
And battery backup is good 
ha  Guys don t hesitate before ordering it you are really searching for a fast mobile with good battery backup within 15k.
The Battery is non removable.
4  Good battery backup
Good Battery support
Good battery back up.
Battery life is ok for a normal user can get along for one day 
All over a awesome phone  just buy and live life happily.
it s having good battery backup.
But this phone can give you a really good battery backup.
Battery   Battery backup is really good   it easily lasts for 1 day on medium usage.
After almost two weeks of use  I can say that the battery life is insanely good  best standby time i ve ever seen.
Battery is good for a day
  Very good battery life for a light user.
It is a very good phone  no overheating  average battery life  support high level games  but if you are looking for a phone having a very good camera quality  just DO NOT go for it.
battery backup is also good 
battery back up is good compared to its battery 
Battery  Till now battery backup is good.
its feel u have i phone 6  premium build quality   good battery backup  nice display  white colour are so premium.
Battery  With 2470 Mah  the battery life is stellar and it lasts me an average of 2 days with moderate usage and 3 days with light use.
Good battery backup.
battery is good for moderate users.
 Battery Life is awesome  after a full charge and using for 5 hours with browsing on Wifi  downloading apps and few clicks with cam and 3 slow motion video and whatsapp  battery is still at 80 
 Bst Mobile in this range  nice camera and good battery life.
All i wanted was good battery  display and music quality.
Good battery backup .
Non removable Battery.
 Camera is very good quality and over all good some battery problem is here but other wise good 
Battery life is awesome motorola give us a new dual usb port charger its look premium   i used this for my two divices at the same time  
 Good battery backup for whole day
Battery is very good  if battery drain apps to closed.
very good performance laz free battery backup is good camera is not that good its medium quality.
GOOD battery life  good sound quality.
3  5 inch Perfect screen size for standard use with good battery Backup
 Very good phone with good battery life.
--------------------------------------------------------
bad display  -51
1 battery backup is super cool I m able to access upto 19 hours without battery saver mode  loudspeaker is awesome and I don t feel any kind of disturbances  4G connectivity works fine  camera clarity is 101  better both in day and night  display is sturdy  touch functions excellently  design is good  my device doesn t get heated up Normally temp goes upto 37C  even i can able to play heavy games like Asphalt 8  Nova 3 and many more  water resistant feature works well  Flipkart now a days started selling refurbished products to the customer  so it s better to buy from Moto maker b coz we can select our own design and place the order  I had paid extra 2k INR to purchase from Moto maker and it took 10 days to ship the product to India from USA and another 3 days to deliver at my door step  Thankya Moto maker.
The display looks dull compared to the other one.
I have a yellowish display when compared to one with other Moto g3.
 Display   Touch  While the display is not full HD  the colours are vibrant and bright.
display is good if you havent used 1080p displays  because its only 720p which i think ok for all of us but if u are looking for good display with cool colour contrast then its a no
Camera quality is too good and display is vibrant.
The display is bit dull.
1  Display 8 10 It is good but not best in its segment.
 NIce but display is not good no hangging nice updaates.
Same display as 2nd gen. Rivals gives full HD panels for the same price range.
the only major flaw that I noticed is the display   The display is not as great we see in some of the mid low range phones.
also display is not good.
compared to Full HD sharp displays like MI or Yu Yureka in this category  
Slightly disappointed as its not having notification light but after using with Active Screen display really good and beautiful.
Display is same as 2nd gen.
Having full HD just for sake of it at the cost of battery does not make sense.
Nothing to complain about this product except for its slightly disappointing lack of full HD display.
Display As there are talks like it has a same display like its predecessor but there are some technical changes has applied with the 3rd gen moto g. as the display comes with a same resolution and ppi but it is retina this time when u hold it 30cm from eye level.
if it had LED notification and full HD display.
Only thing that lacks is an amoled display specially due to no notification LED .
15  and 4 days back when i checked my mobile  plastic of top speaker torn  immediately i mail to FLIKART  they told me go to moto authorised service center  the guy at service center told me that it can not be done  because the plastic is a part of display and you have to change whole display and the cost of display is around 10 000 .
Even though its not full HD  but you won t feel much difference.
Overall  I find the active display on the Moto to be more useful than the light .
It have not full hd display but the display is awesome like ratina sun display  I have tested it on sun light but It does not effected and showed as normal.
Not the Brightest Display and not full HD.
Display  Extremely poor display   When i played the same video on all of my 3 devices  yes all previous 2 still alive   running  there was a quality gap as wide as a canyon.
The Display is very average.
if they put full hd display in this phone and same battery then everyone will complaint about battery drainage .
so i think display is right at its place.
LCD IPS Display is worst when comparing to the other phones.
Display is nice not amazing headphone is not good as i expected but worth the money u cant take better than this in this price range.
Screen is sharp although not full HD but does the job perfectly.
The color depth   details were so poor in moto display i felt like looking into a 90s salora Tv.
But both having same size display moto is smaller in length  comfortable carrying inside pocket.
Battery is good  However  it will drain out easily since the display is not so good and you need to keep the brightness at a higher level.
Display  The display is sharp and crisp  colours are vibrant and although has less and outdated resolution  1280X720  the screen quality is very good.
3 Moto display Its much better than LED notifications  
Display  Poor display its not full HD other fones u will get FHD in the same price.
15 Moto display Its much better than LED notifications.good display  72
Moto display is good enough for me.
 Nice product  nice display  good bettery for 3g  love the waterproof feature in the phone  faster ram.
Over all the display is good.
Display is good and the 2GB ram is the highlight feature for this phone.
In this price range  its good phone  ignoring little heating issue  no full HD .
Even the lower range devices have better display.
Moto display was unique.
the display would have been better if it was FHD  but lower reso results in better battery backup.
Display is clear and vibrant.
Display is also good.
All the above are quite good in certain aspect s. Some has good display  good camera  good processor good sound  good UI  good looks  good grip  perfect screen size  good ram management.
Display is good
very nice Interface with real google Experience  Speed is Good  I Installed 35 apps without any hang  Looking Good  Display Good  overall size of the phone is very comfortable  Camera clarity is awesome in both Front and Rear cameras 
Motorola says they don t have the part new display  available and it will take more time.
It s just 720p IPS LCD display making 294 ppi similar to the previous gen Moto G. Yes  its vertical lines of digitizer is visible in sunlight that might be irritating for users.
Features like shake to open camera  chop to open flash and ambient display are extremely useful and convenient to have.
In your day to day use  a full HD display only consumes more battery as opposed to visible differences  
I m more than happy with a 720p display.
Same display as 2nd gen. Rivals gives full HD panels for the same price range.
If you look the phone screen in full brightness from different angles  than you can clearly see number of lines on the whole display.
The design is sturdy  display is great though it is 720p  with the advantage it doesn t kill your battery like the 1020p s  call quality is good  camera is great.
when i see my mobile through an angle i am able to see a pattern of vertical lines Grid on the display  clearly visible in sunlight outdoor lighting when you turn off screen display.
 best in HD quality  u can t differentiate either its HD or full HD 
I have read that gamers prefer a full HD display.
2. display is good
Good display size  no lag soft touch.
Second phone which got started hanging issue If i use any application display goes blank and nothing will respond  this is non removable battery henceforth we have to wait until phone gets responding.
Display is very good.
but ya if you want a phone with good battery life and decent display you should buy this.
but only 720p  even Redmi 2  7000rs  display is awesome than this it is 1080p  More yellow tone than white 
All other features like Camera  display  looks all are good so giving 2 stars for that.
But it should at least be 3000 mah since the display is large.
So if want a really Good display  better look at other options.
Display is very good 
I m satisfied with 720p display.
No lagging in full hd games and full hd vedios.
1  Good display
Display  The display ain t full HD.
HD display looking great
4  Display is good and lag free  music player audio quality is great boon in this mobile and 
1  The display is really crisp.
a decent display.
so i think display is right at its place.
Expected full HD 1080p  display at this price point.
Led notification along with moto smart display
5 5  Cool display and is equally good to veiw it from extreme angles 
Display is nice.
I don t feel bad eventhough it lacks full HD.
its feel u have i phone 6  premium build quality   good battery backup  nice display  white colour are so premium.
Could have a better display 
At this price  its common to have full HD display .
Good Display
all other features are very good except display.
Sturdy and a decent handset with great display screen  compared to Xperia ZR I have been using previously .
5  Display is good  4 5  
Display  Poor display its not full HD other fones u will get FHD in the same price.
Under 13k there are many good phone available  Like k3  mi4 i  yu plus  asus zenfone 2 etc all are comes with good specification and they have full hd display but one problem that ram management.
would be excellent if it is a FULL HD display.
Brightness is good then G2 sharp and crisp display though 720p But PPI makes it perfect 
--------------------------------------------------------
bad quality  -22
Best build quality strong and premium  thanks FLIPKART 
  Call Quality is exceptional
7  build quality is so good so u keep holding to it and never drop on the floor. 
Call voice quality is gud but not great.
7. call quality was good .
Great build quality  low price  good battery life  good picture quality overall I am impressed 
In call quality is loud and clear with no disturbances.
5  Good design and grip for holding phone in your hands  superb call quality.
Best Call Quality Trust me the call drops in my area is huge but i have had not even a single call drop or voice breaking.
Motorola has always done a great job regarding the build quality and this model too has a great build quality.
Build quality is very good   material used is of good quality and good finishing  slim piece  back cover is attractive as well as designed such as it maintains grip in the hand. 
Good Phone folks  at the price with long lasting build and good quality  hard to find.
10. call quality is good good quality  69
The phone is handy  with good build quality.
Motorola has seriously work on many area of this Phone  Camera is good   Build Quality is fine expecting Metal Body  P .
No heating issue  no lags  nice audio and good build quality.
7. call quality was good .
Call sound quality is crisp and clear
Good Phone folks  at the price with long lasting build and good quality  hard to find.
Call quality is great  noise cancellation through dual microphones.
Call   Voice Quality and Sound Quality very good  basic function of the phone  needs to be good.
 Very good build quality.
Over all very good build quality.
The battery life is good  call quality is clear.
Best phone available in this range  solid build  classy looks.
 The phone Moto G3 build quality is fantastic.
7 Except this  awesome build quality   5 inch screen is good to hold also fits good in pocket .
 Very good build wuality and user interface.
build is very good.
Call quality   5 5  Clear  crisp and good call quality 
But build quality  screen quality  sound quality and camera quality all good.
Call quality is also good
Good build quality
3  GOOD BUILD QUALITY
Call quality is pretty good.
Superb build quality  nice design  both cameras do good job  Android 5.
Build Quality  It looks surprisingly elegant   definitely better looking compared to its predecessors.
Solid build quality.
Excellent Build Quality
Call quality is good.
The call quality is excellent.
Call quality is superb and audio quality seems to be improved over last version.
Moto g3 doesn t heat up and has a good build quality.
Build quality is really premium and I have faced no Lags.
Build Quality   5 5  Really good  
10. call quality is good 
Overall if want a phone with best call Quality and performance this is the best phone in its range.
its feel u have i phone 6  premium build quality   good battery backup  nice display  white colour are so premium.
It s way better than its s Chinese rivals and has a superior build quality.
  Good call quality
call quality  performance and build is awesome.
Audio  Call quality is good.
sturdy build quality.
 Call Quality  Signal reception is excellent  call quality is very good.
 If you need a phone that has a good build quality  stable and where the hardware has a perfect match with the software go with Moto G3.
4G Solid build quality and good looking
Best Call Quality Trust me the call drops in my area is huge but i have had not even a single call drop or voice breaking.
Build quality  Its really quite impressive.
Good quality camera and good build body.
10 Call Quality is very good .
Good build quality  great camera  nice looks.
--------------------------------------------------------
worst mobile  -41
Totally it is the device with better built quality than any other budget device that will last forever.
I am getting approx 5 hours of screen on time 2 sims 1 sim being 3g and the other 2g with mobile data on  and approx 7.
than when i got SECOND device.
Attachment grows  and throwing the device away is painful.
15000. i but moto g 3 it is awesome and best device and i suggest to buy moto g 3 and not mi lenevo and flip kart service is awesome 
7  Transfer to from laptop or other device .
Headset given with the device is average.
Have been using this device from last 6 months.
Good battery back up came upto 8 Hrs with mobile data and 12 Hrs with Wifi and if you dont use internet I guess it will sustain more than a day
i have given return request but you people not responded this mobile is not good even camara is not good  even flip kart response towards customer very bad.
Overall my experience with this device was average  i would rate it 2.
1 has a problem that if you want to open mobile data you have to enter into the setting through notification page and then from there you can open the data connection  but in other version of android you always get a shortcut on notification page to open mobile data.
Though all other features are working just fine  device is not detecting micro usb pen drive  OTG.
I have a Moto G 2nd Gen too and I would say that the improvements aren t as remarkable as they could have been  nevertheless  a reliable device from a reliable brand.
Overall its a good device to buy and considering the build quality its exceptional.
overall its a wonderful device.
No independent device calendar.
2. hardware snapdragon 410 has a decent power management and performance while the 2gb ram is quite powerful that gives the device to run in such a nice and smooth ui without any hiccups.
Don t get me wrong in normal usage you won t feel any heating problem on this device but when i play asphalt 8 for a long time the screen panel do heats a little.
This free SIM supposedly should be swapped with my existing SIM to activate the double data plan offer with the handset Moto G 3rd Gen which is a bundle offer.
5MP Selfie camera was a massive improvement from my previous device.
NOTE  Same OTG cable and Pendrive i have tested on my friends Moto g3 device and it is working fine and smooth.
suprb device as i ever knew them for their quality.
Got this device last week  2 Sep 
After Almost a week s use i am not very happy with the product as compared to mobiles of same price or lower price range.
If display is the priority then you should opt for j5 or other device having amoled screen.
I am very disappointed with the device and its performance.
to enable disable mobile data you have go to setting .
OK or Average Device Sadly with lots of missing essentials
people can think it has an old hardwares comparing with other device with the same price group but it is quite good to run any future updates.
when i got the replacement it was quite surprising  WS retail sent me a used device  its battery was charged to 78 it is always 50  when new OTG is not Working again.
totally unhappy with the product.
Not happy with product as It got delivered with damaged film layer of top speaker .
There should have been a shortcut to enable and disable mobile data.
But there is no on off for mobile data o notification bar awesome mobile  66
but phone is so nice I m happy with this product.
Very easy to pull complete data  contacts  messages and everything from your old phone by connecting through a Moto app.
I am getting approx 5 hours of screen on time 2 sims 1 sim being 3g and the other 2g with mobile data on  and approx 7.
 I Used it for a week now  overall feels like a premium device.
Battery seems to last for good 10 hours with mobile data or wifi on 
this is third phone i have purchased same model to continue gifting my frds and family  they all are pretty happy with this product.
This is a very good mobile in this decade this will be the best one ever.
Would Recommend this to everyone be it exchange or direct purchase  a worth device to have in handy.
Heating up   I did notice that the phone heats up when I am on whatsapp calls for a little long and even on data for long  but I dont know whether to be too worried about it as its happened only once or twice.
So  that s my review on this amazing device.
MOTO G 3rd Generation Its really a super and a awesome device to use.
Device did feel good in.
5 hours of screen on time if the mobile data is off.
Phone is very good mobile.
Now I have used the phone for 2 days and am pretty satisfied with the device.
Firstly I thank Moto team for bring out a great device at a reasonable price.
I thought it would be a very good device based on its specifications and most of all i felt it would be reliable.
If you shake the device the dual led flash will be on and again if you shake it will get off.
than when i got SECOND device.
Totally it is the device with better built quality than any other budget device that will last forever.
not detecting micro usb devices   OTG   I wonder what quality check motorola is doing   How a device passed QC test  unnoticed that it s hardware  Port  is not working   Flipkart will keep replacing device after device but what about waste of time every time  syncing new device with google account    
Enable data.
And can t avail any of the data offers because NO 3G 4G in my area     
It is a very good mobile.
 The device is awesome  but faced heating issues.
 Mobile is very good performance new design best photos from fornt back cameras os ram overall mobile is good.
What matters is the experience and Moto G truly lives up to the expectations of those who want a good device at a reasonable price.
Overall its a good device to buy and considering the build quality its exceptional.
A very good and compatible device.
overall its a wonderful device.
ITS IS A VERY GOOD DEVICE  EVEN MY MY DREAM PHONE 
All in all a great device for a light user in this price range.
Especially Battery life is longer and it is the main plus point of this device because mobile itself means that it should be free from wire.
 The mobile was wonderful and the function was very good so buy.
The Moto 3 G  2015  16 GB Black is very good mobile.
6  Gaming experience on this device was okay  3 5  
Switching on off the mobile data is a two.
 As the title says this is my first android device and fell in love with first touch.
Even using the device in the safe mode the battery drains very drastically  We need to purchase the battery backpack along with the device Except the battery entire device was perfect.
Overall Perfomance of this device is excellent.
Pros  This device is good  smooth UI.
i dont need any repair on this device i need replacement because i have paid for new and fault free device.
9  Gorilla glass makes it scratch proof but be careful as it cost nearly as much as the device itself  to replace it.
Moto G3 is a very good mobile in its price range.
getting heated on mobile data usage.
Such a great gift for my girlfriend birthday she is so happy with this product  thanks a lot to u flipkart for fast delivery 
This device is very much like an android one device .
 Overall its a well balanced decent device and Its worth for Rs.
Very good mobile  every one should have.
to enable disable mobile data you have go to setting .
work you have spent on the particular device to make it successful is lost if you use such type of CHEAP DISPLAY.
under 13k Its a awesome device 
So  I decided that having a reliable device was more important to me  than having the best configuration that my money could buy.
Overall  this phone has pretty much everything need from a good device.
5 5  11GB available when you ON the device due to pre.
the device is slim.
There should have been a shortcut to enable and disable mobile data.
--------------------------------------------------------
bad performance  -25
Performances  Day to day performance is fast  zippy and completely lag.
Overheating  Quick Discharge and worst  occasional hanging and extremely slow performance.
Performance is good but not at par in comparison to lower priced phones.
But with such specifications  do we expect such performance  
3. camera performance is good in daylight but not so good in artificial conditions doesnt mean that the photos are unusable .
free and butter smooth performance. 
The ease of use and the overall performance of the handset makes it worth to have.
  Surprisingly snappy performance 
Touch performance is smooth  does not miss any touches.
Just like apple  Motorola has learnt how to provide flawless performance with low.
 Mobile is very good performance new design best photos from fornt back cameras os ram overall mobile is good.
Overall Performance  Just Buy it  
HD display and overall performance of the phone is very smooth
 I was not sure about its gaming performance due to the sd 410 processor.
snappy performance.
Best thing is RAM and management  If you want to use 2 GB of ram and heavy performance then definitely close ur eyes and purchase the MOTO G3.
who want a phone with good performance hang free but camera does not matter they can buy this product.
Just like apple  motorola has learnt how to provide flawless performance with low.
It might not boast of high performance chipsets or a thin  beautifully chamfered aluminium body or be a Flagship Killer  I m looking at you Oneplus  but god damn this phone is awesome.
very good performance laz free battery backup is good camera is not that good its medium quality.
Performance  Moto G3 is all about user experience rather than beefy specs with poor performance.
performance is also very bad.
I suggest   I buy   I like this fone bcz of Ram management performance and latest android update  waiting for M6.great performance  51
Excellent performance and value for money.
I buy 3 mobile from flipcard all mobile performance very good.
A friend made choice simple for me  he said  you can either opt bigger specs  or better performance.
Excellent performance owing to the stock android and 2 GB RAM.
Graphics and quadCore performance is nice  I have played Asphalt 8 and mortal kombat and it runs fluently.
Camera  although they say it is the same one as in Nexus 6  But I am not impressed with the low light performance of the camera  giving a poor noisy and grainy images.
 Excellent phone  have been using for couple of months now  overall stable performance 
all thing is ok  specially the battery performance is quite good.
Through various benchmarks I found that read write performance of RAM is fast.
Very satisfied with its performance.
Speaker performance is decent but the sound output is amazing on a pair of good earphones  I tried it on Sony earphones.
Mobiles also good performance camera fantastic But suddenly heating problem.
free and butter smooth performance. 
Performance was very good.
high configuratuon with better performance.
very much satisfied with its performance.
In one line go for it if u want a reliable handset with satisfactory spec and great performance.
Dual Sim and Expandable memory up to 32 GB of memory card  use memory card as recommended by Motorola for this phone for a better performance  refer to morotola web site for Motorola recommended memory card.
Over all performance is good.
5  Good performance of 13MP back camera with more features
 Mobile is very good performance new design best photos from fornt back cameras os ram overall mobile is good.
Great look and great performance   just for 13k  i have Moto G   Moto G2 and Moto E. compared to all motos  Moto G3 rocks  just wow.
I d suggest something Don t buy Xiomi  Micromax  Lenovo  honor  Asus  One Plus One  gionee or any other chinese smartphone Cause They will give you the Specifications but Specifications Are nothing when performance is absent  It s always the trap so rember that.
Better performance is awesome after upgrading to android 6 but battery drains like anything if I use WiFi 
Performances  Day to day performance is fast  zippy and completely lag.
Good Performance while general use.
its camera is good and performance is also good.
Though updating the os gives better performance.
Good performance.
Better performance
Performance is good  both in terms of multitasking and moderate gaming
 Having used Moto E extensively I was assured of that Moto G 3 Gen will use its hardware to its optimal performance.
I have using this phone from last 4 days and really happy with performance.
who want a phone with good performance hang free but camera does not matter they can buy this product.
Been using since Jan 2016  never hanged or gave any bogus performance.
Camera and battery performance are very good.
The device performance is very good but the battery drains very very fast.
the performance is very good to had no lag 
performance its too fast for multitasing without any lag.
Performance is absolutely smooth.
Performance at its best.
I am saying reasonable because of the performance  the specs and the build quality.
2. performance is also v. good
 Over all Good phone performance is good with 2 gb ram look is same as previous one.
 Premium feel  top notch performance  ultimate  non.
--------------------------------------------------------
bad_speaker  -33
Although  if you are buying this for music listening on external speaker  go for Xperias.
Top speaker is just for headset mode and bottom speaker is for playing Media.
Loudspeaker  8 10  Compare to G2 the sound is low but its fairly loud though it a single speaker handset came along with the phone is average tested it with Cx180 and i must say the sound quality is awesome  
Radio is not available on speaker.
Speaker is front facing single speaker
Sound  Despite Moto G3 coming with a single speaker  it is very loud and clear.
speaker is loud so gud.
The phone built quality is good  good speaker  primary camara is average nothing great  secondary camara is good  selfie lovers advantage  battery back up is okay usually all phones are the same.
Moto G3  even with a single speaker it s louder than most phones 
1. speaker is bad while volumes are full
Average speaker 
Speakers  Despite the single speaker on the Moto  it s extremely loud and clear in terms of the sound quality  Listening to music is a pleasure  particularly vocals.
 rear camera is not good speaker problem.
Phone is very good  camera quality is awesome  no heating problem even after playing high end games  speaker is too good.
Audio quality is good but its little bit lesser in volume while running in loud speaker.
It has a single speaker on the front  and it is very loud and clear.
I was shocked when I found that while playing music or during putting call on a speaker phone  the top speaker stops producing sound and only bottom speaker works.
Speaker is loud.
some people were concerned about the lack of sterio speakers but even single speaker does its job.
Sound from the front speaker is really loud .
Sound through headphones and speaker is loud and clear.
Speakers are quite loud no problem even it has only one front speaker The other one is ear piece.
Loud speaker given on the front on the mic piece  with no need to put the phone upside down while listening to music or a concall.
there is a tear in plastic cover inside the top speaker grill and there is a airline crack on the left top corner on phone frame .
Placement of the loud speaker is on the front side of the phone.
6  The external Speaker is Mono.
--------------------------------------------------------
usage  -30
36hrs on moderate usage  2.
With moderate usage 10hr backup was all i got.
After one day of usage  I m very satisfied.
I upgraded from LG L90 which is also a good phone with really good battery backup up to 40 hours with moderate usage.
2 hrs of calling and moderate usage.
Also  if you intend to use Google maps for long hours with cellular data and GPS  it does get hot  after about 4 hours of continuous usage.
After heavy usage it ends in about 14 hours.
My old moto g is far far better till date even after 1 year usage it last a full day charge on 3g.
 heavy usage   including 1 hr of constant asphalt 8   30 min of shadow warrior   and 10 min subway surfur   after 2hr gap cause the phn heated up  .
Heating Issue   3 5  Only a bit of screen heating issue after continuous usage where as most of the phones heats a lot every time.
I went for low usage   Calls and Priority messages with Low Gaming and internet usage plus some Photography  as well and it lasted well over 3 days in battery saver mode.
using 2 days with moderate usage.
Battery lasting 7 8 hours of continuous usage  can last for one day in normal use.
No need to worry about the performance but more ram usage leads to more battery usage 
Firstly I must say that the battery usage is optimized  lasting me through an entire day  with moderate usage.
It can easily last you a day even with heavy usage if you give it a full charge in the morning.
screen time with really heavy usage.
 Battery  The 2450mAh battery is carrying me through the day with a mixed usage  again  I am not a heavy gamer  but the battery seems to be quite good.
24 hours on heavy usage.
The battery worked an entire day from 9 am until about 11 30 pm when it switched to batter saver mode  not drained out  with a pretty high usage of WiFi  BT with about 5 hours of screen time 
However  with the same usage pattern  the Mi 4i s battery easily lasts 2 days for me.
17 hours of continuous usage and 15  battery remains.
moderate usage.
good for rough usage.
I checked the temperature  even after heavy usage it was 39 degrees which is good.
6. moto display and moto assist come very handy in everyday usage.
if you r doing mix usage it long last in more than 35 hours.
3 hours music  along with normal talk time and other minor usage.
 moderate usage  including 30 min gaming   30 min of shitty stuffs   50 min of watching videos AND listening to music for 2 hr constantly    
With moderate usage on WiFi .
Even a moderate to low usage does not take you to 12 hours after a full charge.
Battery  With 2470 Mah  the battery life is stellar and it lasts me an average of 2 days with moderate usage and 3 days with light use.
15hrs for heavy usage  
14 hrs  with moderate usage of phone calls and internet.
With 2450 mAh battery it lasts a full day with medium to heavy usage.
2 Days with medium usage and battery saver
--------------------------------------------------------
led notification light  -20
But no flash light in front camera like Samsung J5 J7.
One of the best thing is camera and low light mode is best.
There is no led notification light for message call alert.
70  of the brightness you d get when you use a common light bulb.
Selfies in low light also came out pretty well and good.
1. camera is not good for 13 mega pixl  in day light its good but in low light bad 
You can easily notice this by turning off the display  keep you mobile under light and observe from different viewing angles.
5 5 Low light pictures not good  
First of all touch of the device is smooth like butter performance is good  Camera in low light is very poor but Now Power button of my device is not working properly.
Poor camera in low light 
It gives natural light
Low light could be a sore point  expected at this price range  but for those like on Marriage Ceromonies   Night  The flash holds well.
camera was good but I expected higher than which I got overall good camera and low light photos are good but getting heat when we use huge .
Low light photos as bad as any other phone in this range
Camera quality is poor in low light.
4  Camera is Excellent  even low light photographs come out very good
Some amount of noise might be present in low light but not much to complain.
The cameras are good good low light capture
Cons  13 Mp camera in low light is not at all great.
Also it has to be display light and guest user option but the options are not available in phone.
3  Mindblowing front camera even in low light and awesome rear camera because with Dual smart flash it makes the pic more realistic  Camera 10 10  
Low light photography is appreciable .
You also get Moto x like gestures like twist to launch camera app  double chop to turn on flash light.
Camera is also good both front and back and work fine also low light with flash  Many person gives on their review camera is not good but its average  
 2. camera good in day light but noisy in artificial light.
The front facing camera has a nice feature where the screen lights up to create a soft diffused light to illuminate the face when taking selfies which creates some really beautiful photos.
8 Nic phone to watch HD Videos and movies coz it has good viewing angles with smart light  10 10  
Moto G3 because of better optical utilization and better low light pictures but j5 has a better front camera
Camera is gud but not that gud in low light.
Low light pictures are slightly grainy.
Hand actions for launching flash light  camera and glance screen 
3 Shaking the phone twice to turn on flash light.
Also  although the front camera does not have a flash  still when you put the flash on and click  the screen flashes and the camera takes in as much light as possible.
I ve captured pictures in very low light and the quality I got is simply awesome.
As of now  I got a chance to test the camera and the pictures have come out great both in low light and during the day.
Camera really works in well natural light  at artificial light it performance is above average considering the low price 
Stock android is the fast  light  on RAM  quick to get latest updates since OEM has to make least changes.
 Front Camera is good and back camera is good in daylight but its quite blurred in low light.
Good Camera with Good Light.
Camera   The camera works well in bright ambient light  but in low light it s not up to the mark.
--------------------------------------------------------
heating issue  -13
I am very disappointed with heating issue.
where all of them said that there is not heating issue this device.
Heating Issue   became warm a bit while charging for the first time  so its all good  
main thing is that facing some heating issue that is not good 
abnormal heating sometimes due to recent app installations  software issue .
This is not a problem with the mobile  rather its a problem with how you use it  If you use the correct way  there would be no overheating.
I had grand 2 before motorola g3 and from day one I had heating issues  poor battery back up and despite 1.
Heating problem is not frequent now.
 This phone might be having battery issues  atleast from my usage  with the latest Android installed.
Wrongly recommended to a friend and got scolding s for some other issues with phone.
Heat management  now a days if u compare the phone like zenfone2 mi4 4i yureka  k3note heating problem is freely available  but compare to above one moto g3 heat management is good
I am wondering how motorola producing this type products  Not good battery and heating issue.no heating  18
Friends  I returned Moto G3 for replacement in 3 weeks because I was experiencing heating issue so much that it was uncomfortable to hold in my hand.
In this price range  its good phone  ignoring little heating issue  no full HD .
Some heating issue is found but on continuous using for hrs.
abnormal heating sometimes due to recent app installations  software issue .
No heating issue.
Hello friends i have this product for 2 times but 2 times also got canceled because of some technical issues they are saying different different reasons.
no hanging and heating issue.
You will find heating issue on the screen more than back cover side.
Still Its facing some technical issues.
I m using this mobile for almost a week now found no issues till now and works great.
Pick the 16GB one 8GB is really low on space and might cause issues  HAppy with my first moto.
No heating issue at all.
over all its a good one except heating issue 
Neither did I face any heating issue nor did i face any lag.
and Also they agreed that the device has a heating issue.
After getting my order confirmation and order ID I have contacted the Flipkart costumer care and they told me that your order has been cancelled due to some issues  also they confirmed me that your money will be refunded in 3.
Didn t faced much issues and living the usage.
--------------------------------------------------------
with moto g3  15
2 Overall an average phone the Moto stupid company didnt provided Autofocus in it.
I miss the notification pulse light  as it was in my previous Moto G 1st Gen.
The camera on this moto g3 is great.
Notification LED is not present and Moto Assist doesnt seem to compensate the functionality of a Notification LED
Have been an avid user of Palm Phones  Samsung and recently have been using Moto G 1st generation  switched to Lenovo Phones in between and but came back to the sturdy and stable Moto G. Acquired Moto G 3rd Genration this week from FlipKart.
My old moto g is far far better till date even after 1 year usage it last a full day charge on 3g.
My first love  Moto G  became my obsession for its super looks and price.
Don t go purely with specs  it s ultimate user experience that counts and moto G3 is perfect in that area 
Overall  Moto G3 undoubtedly deserves a 4 out of 5  iff not more.
I am planning to buy the next Moto G as well   
But out of all of these I prefer the Moto G3 the most due to its pure android experience.
CHecked with new Moto G3 Phone no lines at all .
really we are very satisfied with Moto Mobiles   waiting for next generation mobiles Moto G3.
File explorer is not given as other moto   but it is not a factor you can download it from play store  ES FILE EXPLORER  according to me its a best one.
D To verify if the offer still exist  Add this phone and original Moto Flip Cover to your cart.
20 Shake to start torch is a nice MOTO specific application is installed.
Secondly  I exchanged my old Moto G1 for this Phone  so got a great discount too.
 nice moto g3.
do not buy this   go go for lenevo better than moto 
Look for the original moto g3 flip cover  but its too expensive 
Considering previous Moto G model performances  I decided to buy this  even if similar or better specs are available in the market at lower price.
I have a yellowish display when compared to one with other Moto g3.
Hope Lenovo doesn t screw with us and keep Moto to be as original as possible.
resistant construction and deeper customization thanks to Moto Maker  this is undoubtedly the best designed Moto G to date in the series
But Moto G3 is very smooth  without lagging   hanging issue with 12.
no issue with selling new moto set from cheeni itself .
please for next MOTO G camera should be prefect even you can charge 1000 Rs more also not a problem.
 i have buy a new moto g3 2 days before but today its hangs up and i cant understand what to do  
In conclusion i ll give Moto G3 8.
I don t know how come MOTO G3 is getting such great reviews.
The new Moto G offers a mostly stock Android 5.
Camera is better than previous moto Phones.
The service station informed me that the spare parts are not available and as there was no information as to when it would be made available by Moto .
Not worthy comparing to Moto G2 apart from camera .
Heat management  now a days if u compare the phone like zenfone2 mi4 4i yureka  k3note heating problem is freely available  but compare to above one moto g3 heat management is good
 Moto g3 is just rocking its simply outstanding.
The color depth   details were so poor in moto display i felt like looking into a 90s salora Tv.
 White colour looks dull when compare with moto e white  moto e looks bright for look.
 filpkart they send me a moto g 3rd gen duplicate product  filpkart is trusted an orginal product  this is false my moto g pros noooooo cons  heating up to 45c normal use phone
This is my very first Moto product which I have bought after my Sony Xperia.
Camera  It is better than previous Moto G versions.
 Moto g3 is really good.
Exclusive Moto features 
15 Moto display Its much better than LED notifications.
 It is very surprising that the moto g 3rd gen does not have a magnetometer especially when the moto g 2nd gen phone has a magnetometer 
Overall iam very much satisfied with Moto G3.
i have searched motorola users  forum and found that this bug is faced by lot of other moto g3 users globally and motorola has also acknowledged it.
I was expecting so much about moto g 3rd gen.
All the variations in back cover and all customization options are not valid in India  No Motomaker yet so cant customize the G3 for free and the unique coloured back covers cost Rs.
What makes MOTO G3 an unique recommendable phone.
I have not understood Moto s Bluetooth completely.
ALSO I bought original MOTO Flip cover worth Rs.
I dont see much difference in camera as it looks same as MOTO G2 only the pixels increased and pics same as washed out like MOTO G2.
Moto s heavier and bigger  which means I m afraid of dropping it half the time.
Its same as moto g only different is back case and ram other or same.
For the product  Moto G3 was worth the price and it has done a nice job with quad core processor.
fab moto .
Moving data from my Samsung phone to the Moto G was fairly easy  though not complete  using Moto s app Migrate.
MOTO assist functions like double shaking for torch light and double twisting for camera works according to phones mood.
Remaing all are as same as moto g2 
over all mobile is ok. Moto need to solve heating problem of mobile.
I still rember when Moto G 1st gen announced  It was a like a dream specs in very affordable price  That phone actually changed the smartphone market particularly in India  Every other company marched with their phones to challenge the classic Moto G  and lost the battle   
moto g3 is awesome.
Design  Its the same as Moto G2  nothing much new apart from back metallic strip with Moto logo.
 I bought moto g 1st gen on first day of its release  Feb6th 2013  and moto g3 also i bought on first day itself.
dear moto please dont bring new phone so early .
 Happy to be a owner of moto g3  black .
But both having same size display moto is smaller in length  comfortable carrying inside pocket.
It is clearly visible when I compared with other Moto G3 Device.
Overall good come up by moto 
Initially  when i brought moto g2 I was very upset bcoz of battery backup.
Pick the 16GB one 8GB is really low on space and might cause issues  HAppy with my first moto.
i had already use moto g   moto e and moto e2   but this is CLASS .
If you want the old Moto G2 transparent like App Drawer background  you can use a KitKat based launcher and customize the UI look and feel.
Speakers  Despite the single speaker on the Moto  it s extremely loud and clear in terms of the sound quality  Listening to music is a pleasure  particularly vocals.
I bought very first Moto G in my town in Feb 14.
I am still using the same moto g with no problems.
Go for samsung phones guys  moto is no better than any other chinese phone available in market 
I am very happy to have Moto G  3rd Generation .
with out using my mobile in stand by mood it is getting heat more  really i don t like this mobile moto g 3rd gen  totaly i am not happy 
Build quality is not as impressive as Moto G2.
I ve been using my moto g3 from past 3months .
 Guys i got the new moto g 3rd gen 16gb 2gb on friday aftr nun.
Video quality on the Moto is better than on the Xiaomi in my experience.
The image quality of my moto e us better than the primary camera.
3 Moto display Its much better than LED notifications  
Speaker is excellent and greater than Moto G2.
Heating Issues  The Moto heats up a little when charging  but apart from that it is completely free from heating of any kind.
 Phone overall is okay  though Moto G turbo would be the better choice now.
I was completely satisfied with Moto G 1st Gen last year  which I used without a single problem till date.
 Moto g3 is just awesome.
--------------------------------------------------------
to moto g3  13
It is clearly visible when I compared with other Moto G3 Device.
I have a yellowish display when compared to one with other Moto g3.
CHecked with new Moto G3 Phone no lines at all .
Overall iam very much satisfied with Moto G3.
i have searched motorola users  forum and found that this bug is faced by lot of other moto g3 users globally and motorola has also acknowledged it.
But Moto G3 is very smooth  without lagging   hanging issue with 12.
What makes MOTO G3 an unique recommendable phone.
All the variations in back cover and all customization options are not valid in India  No Motomaker yet so cant customize the G3 for free and the unique coloured back covers cost Rs.
 i have buy a new moto g3 2 days before but today its hangs up and i cant understand what to do  
In conclusion i ll give Moto G3 8.
The camera on this moto g3 is great.
I don t know how come MOTO G3 is getting such great reviews.
For the product  Moto G3 was worth the price and it has done a nice job with quad core processor.
 I bought moto g 1st gen on first day of its release  Feb6th 2013  and moto g3 also i bought on first day itself.
Don t go purely with specs  it s ultimate user experience that counts and moto G3 is perfect in that area 
Overall  Moto G3 undoubtedly deserves a 4 out of 5  iff not more.
But out of all of these I prefer the Moto G3 the most due to its pure android experience.
I ve been using my moto g3 from past 3months .
moto g3 is awesome.
Look for the original moto g3 flip cover  but its too expensive 
Heat management  now a days if u compare the phone like zenfone2 mi4 4i yureka  k3note heating problem is freely available  but compare to above one moto g3 heat management is good
 Moto g3 is just rocking its simply outstanding.
really we are very satisfied with Moto Mobiles   waiting for next generation mobiles Moto G3.
 nice moto g3.
 Happy to be a owner of moto g3  black .
 Moto g3 is really good.
 Moto g3 is just awesome.
--------------------------------------------------------
a long time  -13
 Taking long time for full recharge
But if use the device for a long time you will it is very wrong.
After using and searching long time I put this review.
It is taking long time to full charge.
I am not tested for deep or long time in the water but on tap water or small tank I was put my fone for 5 min and still it is working fine no problem.
I tried calling Customer Executive since that day every other day and started writing mail to know what are the discrepancies in the process and how long time will take.
Don t get me wrong in normal usage you won t feel any heating problem on this device but when i play asphalt 8 for a long time the screen panel do heats a little.
 I order Moto G  3rd Gen  LTE and the day I got this phone it start getting heated when i plug to charging or if you talk for long time.
Other options of going for duplicate screen replacement at local shops is not available for this MOTO G. It is hard to find Moto G service centres near by  and even if you find one  they will keep the mobile with them for very very long time  and you would just have to ask them again and again  which could be a frustrating experience.
Phone will get heated when we use it for longer time.
its really good i am middle class family this is v. expensive to buy paid in emi then got i used moto e  moto g  now moto g3 really iam mad in cell world so every time changing but now coming latest so many cells came same feutures moto also but i like this one only really i promise for a long time i use this one only awsome fone motog3 i love it dont think other way ever nd never go a hed to buy this 5 5 all specifications really beleive it.
Zenfone 2 does easily heat up when you click more photos and surfing on internet for a long time.
Haven t faced any issues of overheating with normal use just gets warm when used for a long time and having
3 hours music  along with normal talk time and other minor usage.
Bought long time back  no problem nice features for present time and good I ve 
I am a long time user of motorola smart phones  starting with Motorola Defy .
--------------------------------------------------------
back panel  -12
The build   of the phone is sturdy  especially the back panel which has a diagonal ridged surface which gives a nice grip to the phone  the ridged surfacing on the power button also is a nice addition as you can differentiate between the volume button and power button without looking at the phone.
The new Back panel used by Motorola is Really better Than 1st and 2nd Generation back panel.
Only issue I faced is that there is a mild gap between centre strip  below camera  and the back panel.
2. phone has got good body and its back panel gives you a holding grip .
but moto g3 having problem with back panel.
The front side looks similar to the previous gen Moto G but the back panel provides more grip and a metallic strip covers the camera and the moto logo.
Just bought Moto G3 yesterday  its very cool and stylish  back panel very nice to grip  camera quality is too good 13MP and 5MP.
 Its been 3 days since I ve been using this phone and the back panel has already started to corrode around the area where my palm rests.
1. phone has got good body and its back panel gives you a holding grip .
Lower back panel lines which were less prominent that upper back panel  That happens if the phone stays in someone s hand .
lined  which caused not fitting the back panel properly  the gap between strip and panel is uneven and is so much that it can be vulnerable to water easily  since the device is water resistance so the concerened area should be properly sealed.
Back panel looks great  easy to hold.
Phone has got good body and its back panel gives you a holding grip.
2  Finishing  and back panel are awesome.
 1. phone has got good body and its back panel gives you a holding grip .
Open the back panel and you will love the build quality and the way it is packed.
The back panel is some pastic material  would need a case else gets dirty easily.
Every thing seems good except the back panel it is not a rubber type finish like the one in g2  does not really feel that great in hands.
 it will be heated while using video and games both touch panel and back side.
also the when the back panel is opened  there seems to be a gelly kinda liquid.
and the worst part is that temperature is higher on touch panel compared to back panel  where it supposed to be high.
The back panel and side rim feels good to hold.
When closed properly  you won t see any gap between back panel and the metal strip on the back
The back panel looks premium and gives a nice grip in hand
Back panel looks awesome.
Dropped it in bucket  still it was working completely fine  however you need to ensure that the back panel is properly locked as per the instructions.
The phoen will water resistant only when the back panel is fully fitted otherwise it may harm for device.
--------------------------------------------------------
looks  12
Looks is Good
All the above are quite good in certain aspect s. Some has good display  good camera  good processor good sound  good UI  good looks  good grip  perfect screen size  good ram management.
looks stylish 
good looks  powerful battery and durable one.
 AWASAM phone with awasam stylish looks.
looks stylish.
My first love  Moto G  became my obsession for its super looks and price.
The phone is amazing  looks good  could perform transfers using moto application from one handset to other which was a blessing.
Looks great in hand.
The looks are stylish  as par the standards of a budget device.
Moto G  3rd gen  looks solid.
it has also water resistant feature  not tested and had no wish getting tested on my device  but this feature surely helps you accidental fall of water on this device  the phone though a bit thick and heavy looks very stylish and compact specially the black one   in my opinion  .
--------------------------------------------------------
a full charge  12
Even a moderate to low usage does not take you to 12 hours after a full charge.
I use full charge with 24 7 wifi max 8.
for me the battery runs for more than 24 hours after a full charge with wifi and mobile internet usage.
5 hrs to full charge.
It is taking long time to full charge.
5 hrs for a full charge
It can easily last you a day even with heavy usage if you give it a full charge in the morning.
It takes about 2 hours for a full charge and lasts for a day with average use.
 Battery Life is awesome  after a full charge and using for 5 hours with browsing on Wifi  downloading apps and few clicks with cam and 3 slow motion video and whatsapp  battery is still at 80 
5 hours for full charge.
After full charge also this device is not work at least 6 Hour.
4 Super Battery backup after full charge used Wifi music   others thing for continuous 5 hours   after that it s showing 70  available  
I was worried that it will take 4 hours for full charge.
--------------------------------------------------------
nice speakers  12
15  and 4 days back when i checked my mobile  plastic of top speaker torn  immediately i mail to FLIKART  they told me go to moto authorised service center  the guy at service center told me that it can not be done  because the plastic is a part of display and you have to change whole display and the cost of display is around 10 000 .
Excellent Speaker
Though the back lid is not fitted with finesse and also  plastic film in the top speaker lacks fine finishing.
Not happy with product as It got delivered with damaged film layer of top speaker .
The phone comes up with dual speakers BUT only one speaker is functional at a time.
Cons  Internal memory of 16 GB only  Phone Body built quality is like average  Accessories quality are compromised  like a cheap headphone  charger is just so so and desi in quality  Limited color option  only black and white  and no customization option in India  like the same phone customization option is available in USA  Quality of Camera and Speaker Sound for listening Song etc could have been improved  though phone speaker is great for talking and other voice activity .
best with bass  the front facing speaker is very good to watch movies.
Speaker is excellent and greater than Moto G2.
I request Motorola for providing a resolution for enabling top speaker when putting it on loud speaker and do not disappointment existing customers like this.
Music speaker volume superb.
--------------------------------------------------------
2 gb ram  11
Coming to the RAM which was Upgraded in this Model which comes with 2GB RAM is just perfect with the Times  2015  and the phone never Lagged for me.
On the other note  I think 2 GB RAM is overkill  given the buttery smooth experience of Lollipop and 1 GB RAM should suffice for all basic and general needs.
2 GB ram make it super.
Mine 1 gb ram is always free after installing 20 apps.
Good speed of RAM and enough internal memory 16 GB.
Equipped with 2GB RAM which is apt  or best  for stock android.
3 It has 16 GB ROM  but you will get approx 12 GB free because of already installed mobile applications.
2GB RAM is great.
Rember other 2GB phones in the market like Zenfone2 running on its Zen UI  K3 note with its Vibe UI are filled with bloatwares and a little RAM will be free at any time.
phone was goin smoothest even on moto g 2  1gb ram was also smoothest for all moto like E 2 and Moto G. 3.
2gb ram is helpful
2 GB RAM is sufficient for moderate use.
Battery backup is very good  compared to my previous phone star pro  but its really good  a wonderful 2 GB RAM  very good processor.
I bet 2gb ram is enough for any application and future upgrades.
4  More than 1 GB of Ram available  so no lags even while multitasking and gaming.
2 GB free with some of the task open.
5 gb ram  grand 2 was slow.
10  2 GB ram makes it quite snappy 
2 GB of RAM with no bolt ware  and awesome RAM management  5 5
23 GB free  Very good front and main Camera performance in normal and low light condition  good sound quality and fidelity.
2. hardware snapdragon 410 has a decent power management and performance while the 2gb ram is quite powerful that gives the device to run in such a nice and smooth ui without any hiccups.
Good Ram  2GB  and Internal Memmory  16GB 
1. good ram 2GB so awsom fast working
It has 2GB RAM and 1GB is free after loading many apps.
Bottom line it has improved too much interms of performance as compare to moto G. 2014 which I had earlier due to its 2GB RAM and processor GPU 
2GB  but only 600MB is used by system  in other mobiles 1GB is atleast used by system  so motog with 2GB ram and other with 3GB ram is equivalent since the free memory is 1GB .
It is highly recommended that you may go with the 16 GB model because it has 2 GB RAM while the 8 GB model has 1 GB RAM which in today s scenario may fall short.
Rear camera 13mp  2Gb ram  16gb internal 
More than 1GB RAM available when mobile is idle.
 Over all Good phone performance is good with 2 gb ram look is same as previous one.
Requested for 16 GB internal memory but it shows total memory is 12 GB and available is 11 GB.
--------------------------------------------------------
value for money  10
Believe me guys Moto G3 stand no way near to Moto G2 in terms of display  5 Stars for Moto G2 which has gone down to 9999 and a complete value for money now .
First of all 5. for the phone  its a true value for Money.
True value for money.
i have never used android before this but i must say its a nice phone with good value for money.
GREAT VALUE FOR MONEY 
 Good value for money.
as it is complete value for money  Go for it.
For the money a customer pay  the mobile is good value. 
Overall its a nice phone and gives great value for money.
This phone is an excellent value for money.
Good one value for money  performance is good photo quality is good
 i was purchased it from flipkart almost 4 month later its working great its value for money.
--------------------------------------------------------
ipx7 water resistance  -10
YES  you can dip this phone in up to 3 feet of fresh water for up to 30 minutes  how many phones can do that at this price.
1 battery backup is super cool I m able to access upto 19 hours without battery saver mode  loudspeaker is awesome and I don t feel any kind of disturbances  4G connectivity works fine  camera clarity is 101  better both in day and night  display is sturdy  touch functions excellently  design is good  my device doesn t get heated up Normally temp goes upto 37C  even i can able to play heavy games like Asphalt 8  Nova 3 and many more  water resistant feature works well  Flipkart now a days started selling refurbished products to the customer  so it s better to buy from Moto maker b coz we can select our own design and place the order  I had paid extra 2k INR to purchase from Moto maker and it took 10 days to ship the product to India from USA and another 3 days to deliver at my door step  Thankya Moto maker.
3  Can t trust the water resistant mechanism as the back cover never covers the phone perfectly.
Due to water resistant back case fully sealed .
better than expected  fast  water proof  stock android the best  no useless apps pre installed.
Now to the phone  it has better processor  better RAM 2 GB   pure Android  13 MP very fast rear camera and water resistant features etc etc all this was known from specifications.
Due that water may enter in and it give a unfinished product.
Apart above two i would overall a worth to buy water resistant phone for 13k 
Water resistance  certainly a plus point  and indeed this is a good water resistant phone.
Motorola says phone is water resistant  If back cover is properly fit .
Water resistant feature is great though i haven t yet tested.
Smooth operations  nice GUI  specially what makes it best is water resistant and best look no phone in this range can beat this look .
But I am sure it can withstand accidental water splashes
It has corning gorilla glass 3 protection and also the phone is IPX7 rated which means it is water resistant upto 1 meter for 30 mins.
But it says that phone is water resistant only with back cover on.
Water resistant   wow.
It is water resistant  i verified it.
i used this product for 24 hours   after using i write my honest review   Moto G 3rd gen was a very premium phone loaded with new water resistant feature.
Last and most important is it is ipx7 water resistance which is 10 5 .
I am using it from last 6 days and really feels that its a great phone in such price range in terms of build quality  camera  memory  storage space and most important water resistance.
lined  which caused not fitting the back panel properly  the gap between strip and panel is uneven and is so much that it can be vulnerable to water easily  since the device is water resistance so the concerened area should be properly sealed.
also water resistant overall super 
2 even though moto says waterproof water gets into the backcover even if spill a little.
do not play with water resistant feature.
you can enjoy water resistance but not under pressured water
Though this is a water resistant mobile  I have not tested it.
Water certainly goes inside the cover  but as it is water resistant  it does not enter the sealed phone.
it has also water resistant feature  not tested and had no wish getting tested on my device  but this feature surely helps you accidental fall of water on this device  the phone though a bit thick and heavy looks very stylish and compact specially the black one   in my opinion  .
Agreed that neither does it provide full water proofing but never mind  I don t plan to use my phone while swimming.
I am not tested for deep or long time in the water but on tap water or small tank I was put my fone for 5 min and still it is working fine no problem.
Motorola claims it to be water resistant and asking to check the back cover fitted properly  but its back cover is showing a big gap near the camera.
--------------------------------------------------------
stock android experience  9
worst experience ever.
I also got an update to Android Marshmallow the very day it got delivered  so  free android system updates 
Feels a premium experience while handling.
The bad experience of mine that s it.
Some controls over our files   This is pure Android  I guess  
It gives smooth experience like butter.
Best Android within 11k.
user interface is good and anybody new to Android can easily operate as it is user friendly and easy.
Pure Android experience same as in Google Nexus devices.
This phone is so awesome that for the first time I had never been happier with an Android phone.
Absence of unnecessary bloatware makes the overall experience smooth and immersive.
My experience was very bad with this.
Go for it if you can spend extra couple for thousands for better experience.
7. latest android 5.
Overall great experience.
My waiting for 3 months for getting a good android mobile has come to a perfect end.
Speakers have good quality of sound  the speaker is at front side  so watching youtube videos is good experience on this phone.
 Even though there are phones with better cpu gpu specs in this price range on the market  this phone offers the best overall experience.
latest android update.
Pure android experience and no bloatware
But how many of them gives you a pure android experience.
 This is my first Android phone of big screen brought by me .
If you install MS Word and Powerpoint  it will be a great experience.
Moto phones are the only devices that offer the stock nexus like android experience which is smooth and lag free.
Pure and fast android experience
all the feature are awesome but this problem ruined the whole experience .
Even though G2 gave me a hard time the software updates  and smooth clean and virgin android experience was too much to let go.
My first experience was good.
Assisting features  Moto additions to stock Android are actually useful  such as the active display.
It was very slow from my experience even from phone to SD card when we use USB mode in laptop  but very fast when we use file manager app of phone .
 This phone might be having battery issues  atleast from my usage  with the latest Android installed.
lenovo and zen phone providing far better camera experience in low priced phones.
yet to recieve my airtel sim and overall good experience in mid level range 
The experience has been same.
 This is the first android phone I have bought after using Windows Phone for last 6 years.
2GB ram helps you to get flawless experience.
Overall my experience with this device was average  i would rate it 2.
It gives you a pure android experience without any bloatwares.
Very worst experience by Moto G 3.
Any non stock Android phone s UI consumes a huge chunk of RAM  take Mi or Zenfone UI.
that Android can be just as good  if not better  even on a low.
Stock android so around 1100 MB of ram is always available  so android experience is smooth.
The android is more stable and very very less troublesome than Cynogen OS12.
 Amazing experience.
I had a bad experience with it as the second sim card slot stopped functioning after 3 months.
Ultimately my MOTO experience has been outstanding.
Yes it is not the top line of the hardware however it works better than the rest and having high bench mark doesnt necessarily mean it is best as Operating system could ruin the whole experience like xiomi or Lenovo UI  why they bother so much to be like IOS it I wanted one I would have bought IPhone   
1 experience is good  But Its great that it will receive Android 6.
Call experience is not good due to frequent signal loss.
and let me tell u honestly its been a great experience .
They tell go to store and verified from there so what the meaning of 30 days replacement policy   I had very poor experience with flipkart services.
Like everyone else has already said  this phone gives you the best android experience at this price range.
i consulted MOTO G service center had a worst experience secundrabad branch  and he removed my tempered glass and gave it back and said that we will contact you later  no scratch on screen is observed  he called me back saying that motherboard is damaged and it will not come under warranty.
stock android experience is very good.
Pure Android is always great.
I own a motorola g2 and after having the best android experience of my life when it was time to buy a budget phone for my sister i looked no further than motorola.
 As usual stock android proves to be the best.
It was very bad experience for me.
Really you can get a pure android experience.
User experience is simply awesome.
i have never used android before this but i must say its a nice phone with good value for money.
User experience on the stock Android is pretty good.
it recieves all updates  it is very smooth and it gives a clean android experience for those who hate bloat.
better than expected  fast  water proof  stock android the best  no useless apps pre installed.
software  now this one is tricky  however it comes with latest android 5.
Feeling a little optimistic for Android M  as Motorola phones get updates as per my experience.
The whole experience of using this phone is so satisfying.
The price has been kept reasonable and hardware specs though not top of the line  have been beautifully matched with the software and the result is a beautiful phone running almost raw android with zero lag and zero heating issue.
2  software experience is very smooth .
 Nice one  the phone is having a great experience of games and I loving it .
This is my first android phone after using windows  lumia 520 .
According to review you ll find many people complaing this phone and I was also very disappointed but in my experience there is no cons in the moto g3.
Equipped with 2GB RAM which is apt  or best  for stock android.
You cant go wrong with a mostly stock Android Lollipop experience  with Motorolas enhancement too.
The phone s UI feels smooth and fast due to stock Android.
After purchase within 5 days the display of the phone got damaged which i accept that its my fault but when i take to the service centre  the guys there told that the display unit is not available in stock and when it will come also they wont be able to tell the details.
So the conclusion is Its a worst experience of mine buying a product frm Flipcart  and that too all my surprise  gift to my fathers 60th Birthday  spoiled.
The user experience is comparable to the likes of Samsung S4 or OnePlus One.
Believe it or not this is my First Android Phone in my Life time.
0 marshmallow and the experience is excellent.
Moto G3 hands down  pure android experience no lag  no bloatware and a guaranteed update everytime 
And pure android experience is best feature of tge phone 
best android phone available at this price bracket.
Pure Android experience 
enjoying smooth stock android.
free and relatively fluid stock android.
Stock android L experience is great.
The device runs smooth as a butter which is always a very pleasant experience.
The Mi 4i is slightly less loud in my experience  and the speakers  located on the back  tend to get muffled if you keep it on a desk or pillow  but this might be subjective.
One gets to use clean Android UI.
If high spec hardware is not tuned properly  then desired usage experience can not be achieved.
It comes with pure android   we take this advantage like Google nexus.
Suggest you to download ES File Explorer and VLC for Android for the same.
For all those who face notification issue problm   plz learn to use latest stock andriod UI.
 Overall great experience.
I am sharing my personal experience with Moto G3 .
Feels good in hand and gives a premium experience in public.
very pathetic experience with this phone.
The stock android is also beautiful and as expected  very fast.
Other options of going for duplicate screen replacement at local shops is not available for this MOTO G. It is hard to find Moto G service centres near by  and even if you find one  they will keep the mobile with them for very very long time  and you would just have to ask them again and again  which could be a frustrating experience.
core but highly stable OS and that user experience is difficult to find.
I was very much depressed with my latest experience on Flipkart.
fast and smooth android.
And The Best Part Of This Phone Is That It Gives A Pure Android Experience I Do Not Like Those Skined Versions Of Android That Brands Like Samsung  Song  Lg  etc Offer.
its one of the best phone i ever used  yes I have used Note 3 with 3GB ram blah blah  but the pure android experience is with Moto G 3rd Gen  Great Camera  no lag  best in class.
true Android but little overpriced.
Have had a great experience so far.
But in real life user experience you will say its very good.
Shipped with stock android  or the closest to stock android .
I didn t expect Flipkart gits this type of weird experience for festival .
I had a terrible overall experience of the site an its people.
--------------------------------------------------------
pure android experience  -8
Pure Android experience same as in Google Nexus devices.
And pure android experience is best feature of tge phone 
Happy with Pure Android Lollipop  IPX7 water.
It gives you a pure android experience without any bloatwares.
Pure and fast android experience
It comes with pure android   we take this advantage like Google nexus.
Some controls over our files   This is pure Android  I guess  
Pure Android experience 
Really you can get a pure android experience.
Pure android experience and no bloatware
And The Best Part Of This Phone Is That It Gives A Pure Android Experience I Do Not Like Those Skined Versions Of Android That Brands Like Samsung  Song  Lg  etc Offer.
Pure Android is always great.
But how many of them gives you a pure android experience.
its one of the best phone i ever used  yes I have used Note 3 with 3GB ram blah blah  but the pure android experience is with Moto G 3rd Gen  Great Camera  no lag  best in class.
Moto G3 hands down  pure android experience no lag  no bloatware and a guaranteed update everytime 
--------------------------------------------------------
to moto g  7
Considering previous Moto G model performances  I decided to buy this  even if similar or better specs are available in the market at lower price.
 It is very surprising that the moto g 3rd gen does not have a magnetometer especially when the moto g 2nd gen phone has a magnetometer 
It is clearly visible when I compared with other Moto G3 Device.
I am very happy to have Moto G  3rd Generation .
Overall good come up by moto 
I bought moto g last year when motorola phones were launched in India.
2 Overall an average phone the Moto stupid company didnt provided Autofocus in it.
Hope Lenovo doesn t screw with us and keep Moto to be as original as possible.
I dont see much difference in camera as it looks same as MOTO G2 only the pixels increased and pics same as washed out like MOTO G2.
Initially  when i brought moto g2 I was very upset bcoz of battery backup.
Pick the 16GB one 8GB is really low on space and might cause issues  HAppy with my first moto.
i had already use moto g   moto e and moto e2   but this is CLASS .
resistant construction and deeper customization thanks to Moto Maker  this is undoubtedly the best designed Moto G to date in the series
Its same as moto g only different is back case and ram other or same.
 Guys i got the new moto g 3rd gen 16gb 2gb on friday aftr nun.
Heat management  now a days if u compare the phone like zenfone2 mi4 4i yureka  k3note heating problem is freely available  but compare to above one moto g3 heat management is good
But both having same size display moto is smaller in length  comfortable carrying inside pocket.
I was expecting so much about moto g 3rd gen.
I am still using the same moto g with no problems.
I upgraded to a moto g3 16 G smart ph after using using samung ace phone for 4.
I miss the notification pulse light  as it was in my previous Moto G 1st Gen.
ALSO I bought original MOTO Flip cover worth Rs.
no issue with selling new moto set from cheeni itself .
If you want the old Moto G2 transparent like App Drawer background  you can use a KitKat based launcher and customize the UI look and feel.
please for next MOTO G camera should be prefect even you can charge 1000 Rs more also not a problem.
 i have buy a new moto g3 2 days before but today its hangs up and i cant understand what to do  
In conclusion i ll give Moto G3 8.
Moto s heavier and bigger  which means I m afraid of dropping it half the time.
Remaing all are as same as moto g2 
I bought very first Moto G in my town in Feb 14.
I don t know how come MOTO G3 is getting such great reviews.
Have been an avid user of Palm Phones  Samsung and recently have been using Moto G 1st generation  switched to Lenovo Phones in between and but came back to the sturdy and stable Moto G. Acquired Moto G 3rd Genration this week from FlipKart.
The new Moto G offers a mostly stock Android 5.
Design  Its the same as Moto G2  nothing much new apart from back metallic strip with Moto logo.
My old moto g is far far better till date even after 1 year usage it last a full day charge on 3g.
Moving data from my Samsung phone to the Moto G was fairly easy  though not complete  using Moto s app Migrate.
MOTO assist functions like double shaking for torch light and double twisting for camera works according to phones mood.
Go for samsung phones guys  moto is no better than any other chinese phone available in market 
Overall  Moto G3 undoubtedly deserves a 4 out of 5  iff not more.
I am planning to buy the next Moto G as well   
Build quality is not as impressive as Moto G2.
with out using my mobile in stand by mood it is getting heat more  really i don t like this mobile moto g 3rd gen  totaly i am not happy 
CHecked with new Moto G3 Phone no lines at all .
Not worthy comparing to Moto G2 apart from camera .
over all mobile is ok. Moto need to solve heating problem of mobile.
I still rember when Moto G 1st gen announced  It was a like a dream specs in very affordable price  That phone actually changed the smartphone market particularly in India  Every other company marched with their phones to challenge the classic Moto G  and lost the battle   
File explorer is not given as other moto   but it is not a factor you can download it from play store  ES FILE EXPLORER  according to me its a best one.
i have searched motorola users  forum and found that this bug is faced by lot of other moto g3 users globally and motorola has also acknowledged it.
do not buy this   go go for lenevo better than moto 
I have a yellowish display when compared to one with other Moto g3.
Battery  The battery on the Moto G can last easily over a day  but it would be wrong to expect more of the 2470mAh battery.
The color depth   details were so poor in moto display i felt like looking into a 90s salora Tv.
D To verify if the offer still exist  Add this phone and original Moto Flip Cover to your cart.
Speakers  Despite the single speaker on the Moto  it s extremely loud and clear in terms of the sound quality  Listening to music is a pleasure  particularly vocals.
 White colour looks dull when compare with moto e white  moto e looks bright for look.
really we are very satisfied with Moto Mobiles   waiting for next generation mobiles Moto G3.
Secondly  I exchanged my old Moto G1 for this Phone  so got a great discount too.
 filpkart they send me a moto g 3rd gen duplicate product  filpkart is trusted an orginal product  this is false my moto g pros noooooo cons  heating up to 45c normal use phone
As i buy moto g  3rd generation  because of 13 mega pixcel camera but camera is not good.
Overall iam very much satisfied with Moto G3.
 nice moto g3.
In my opinion moto g is the best in this price range.
dear moto please dont bring new phone so early .
The 410 is a very old chipset not much of an upgrade from the previous gen Moto G  same hardware is there in Moto E 2nd gen. 7.
My first love  Moto G  became my obsession for its super looks and price.
To sum up  Moto G looks good on papers with flashy specs but dissapoints on quality parameters.
Heating Issues  The Moto heats up a little when charging  but apart from that it is completely free from heating of any kind.
The image quality of my moto e us better than the primary camera.
This is my very first Moto product which I have bought after my Sony Xperia.
Speaker is excellent and greater than Moto G2.
Camera  It is better than previous Moto G versions.
Look for the original moto g3 flip cover  but its too expensive 
 Phone overall is okay  though Moto G turbo would be the better choice now.
Got the white color Moto G  looks fantastic out of box  But that s where the excitement ended  the touch screen was non responsive.
I was completely satisfied with Moto G 1st Gen last year  which I used without a single problem till date.
--------------------------------------------------------
in low light  -7
 Battery life is at its worst  and Low light camera too  
Some amount of noise might be present in low light but not much to complain.
Selfies in low light also came out pretty well and good.
1. camera is not good for 13 mega pixl  in day light its good but in low light bad 
5 5 Low light pictures not good  
First of all touch of the device is smooth like butter performance is good  Camera in low light is very poor but Now Power button of my device is not working properly.
Poor camera in low light 
Low light photography is appreciable .
Low light could be a sore point  expected at this price range  but for those like on Marriage Ceromonies   Night  The flash holds well.
camera was good but I expected higher than which I got overall good camera and low light photos are good but getting heat when we use huge .
 Front Camera is good and back camera is good in daylight but its quite blurred in low light.
4  Camera is Excellent  even low light photographs come out very good
One of the best thing is camera and low light mode is best.
The cameras are good good low light capture
Cons  13 Mp camera in low light is not at all great.
3  Mindblowing front camera even in low light and awesome rear camera because with Dual smart flash it makes the pic more realistic  Camera 10 10  
Camera is also good both front and back and work fine also low light with flash  Many person gives on their review camera is not good but its average  
Low light photos as bad as any other phone in this range
Moto G3 because of better optical utilization and better low light pictures but j5 has a better front camera
Camera is gud but not that gud in low light.
Low light pictures are slightly grainy.
As of now  I got a chance to test the camera and the pictures have come out great both in low light and during the day.
I ve captured pictures in very low light and the quality I got is simply awesome.
Camera really works in well natural light  at artificial light it performance is above average considering the low price 
Camera quality is poor in low light.
Camera   The camera works well in bright ambient light  but in low light it s not up to the mark.
--------------------------------------------------------
rear and front  7
Camera is just too good  front as well as the main.
rear camera quality is not bad  front is also fine.
Now Now there are small things like slight price difference dual flash front facing flash 4G LTE but thats up to you.
Camera is awesome in outdoor  but in indoor comparatively low but very good  Front camera is also very good.
Why the picture come very noisy in indoor light  whether its rear or front  both have the same problem.
good rear and front camera quality.
This is the case when you are in good or medium lightning conditions so if you re clicking pictures in dark or low lighting the picture quality is only mediocre Rear Front  and looks a little bit artificial Front Cam .
nice front and back cam 
3  Mindblowing front camera even in low light and awesome rear camera because with Dual smart flash it makes the pic more realistic  Camera 10 10  
its good front and rear cam.
Camera is also good both front and back and work fine also low light with flash  Many person gives on their review camera is not good but its average  
Anyway  the phone has a very good camera at 13 MP and a nice front camera at 5 MP.
It has a single speaker on the front  and it is very loud and clear.
23 GB free  Very good front and main Camera performance in normal and low light condition  good sound quality and fidelity.
Moto G3 because of better optical utilization and better low light pictures but j5 has a better front camera
Very Nice front Camera.
Camera is absolutely fine both front and back.
5MP Front is as well good.
The camera feature is good specially the rear one is excellent but the front one is normal.
Camera is just awesome 13mp rear with dual flash n 5mp front is gud in light in dark it s low .
camera quality is too good both front and back. 
Very good front cam in this range.
--------------------------------------------------------
motorola  6
We will replace the charger  but it wont be a new one as motorola wont sell charger alone.
Motorola is dishonest in its response and completely insensitive to Customer needs .
I wish I had known this earlier before buying a Motorola.
The type of display used by Motorola is very cheap.
This is my second motorola phone purchased from Flipkart.
thanks a lot to glevin brothers to gave a such a iconic motorola to world.
I became famous overnight  in fact Motorola made me famous .
Motorola has kept it simple and given what the customer want  although a better chip would have great  budget phone with a great camera and battery life .
they them self agree that motorola backup service 
Though I dont trust Motorola  yet this has been a smart buy.
This is my first Motorola device I got my phone yesterday  but I m already in love with my Moto G  3rd GEN .
Camera   at last Motorola upgraded there camera.
But when i compare the new motorola phone  oh boy  it is fast and responsive.
This is quite surprising  considering that Motorola was not long ago owned by Google  who make the Android OS.
the product was good at the start and the gorilla glass is not so hard it is so delicate and it broken jst fell from a small height even with glass protection and the motrola service centre kept my mobile more than 2 month at the service centre and stil the repair was not done and the answer from the service centre side is the spare parts are not available with the motorola and again i went outside and placed local dispaly which again had a crack and now the software is also corrupted and the service centre people says the device wil not fell under warranty so they wont update the software for free and they wil charge the amount.
I am a long time user of motorola smart phones  starting with Motorola Defy .
I had grand 2 before motorola g3 and from day one I had heating issues  poor battery back up and despite 1.
dear  motorola ple change your headset quality.
Good additional Motorola Software Features like Migrate  Moto Assist  Data Migration  Double karate chop for torch  Twist for Quick Capture etc. 
Very Worst Motorola Service  i took Moto g3   in the span of 40 days Motherboard problem still my problem is not rectified   daily motorola people saying tomorrow  tomorrow 
I m sorry to say that I m not going to buy Motorola phones from now.
i have Moto G. 2 and i found not much difference except the configuration  the usability experiance remain same  motorola Forgot to work on user Convenience.
Happy to be a Motorola user 
The best in this Motorola is we can update the OS in any time if update is there.
I own a motorola g2 and after having the best android experience of my life when it was time to buy a budget phone for my sister i looked no further than motorola.
--------------------------------------------------------
same price range  -6
But acceptable for this price range.
Still  I must mention that it is much better that phones in the same price range.
 One best smartphone in its smart price range  Best to buy from slipkart for the timely delivery  Loved it  
However today Acer launched a phone with a better configuration in this same price range  Acer Z630S .
After Almost a week s use i am not very happy with the product as compared to mobiles of same price or lower price range.
Great camera  one of the best in this price range 
Just compare how much faster the zenphone 2 is at the same price range.
yeah  maybe some other brand may offer far more superior specification for the same price range or may be a little less.
Screen is not that sensitive if we compare with Windows from same price range.
I am using it from last 6 days and really feels that its a great phone in such price range in terms of build quality  camera  memory  storage space and most important water resistance.
Same display as 2nd gen. Rivals gives full HD panels for the same price range.
There are some other phones available in market within same price range  but I will definitely recommend it.
--------------------------------------------------------
to moto g2  -5
Build quality is not as impressive as Moto G2.
If you want the old Moto G2 transparent like App Drawer background  you can use a KitKat based launcher and customize the UI look and feel.
where in Moto G2 does the same with 2 sim on 1and half day 
I dont see much difference in camera as it looks same as MOTO G2 only the pixels increased and pics same as washed out like MOTO G2.
Not worthy comparing to Moto G2 apart from camera .
Initially  when i brought moto g2 I was very upset bcoz of battery backup.
though i have put custom ROM Titan Prime ROM on MOTO G2 which i get 800mb free which is very enough for smooth running of apps.
Speaker is excellent and greater than Moto G2.
Design  Its the same as Moto G2  nothing much new apart from back metallic strip with Moto logo.
The first thing I noticed about this phone strangely that though this phone has a 2GB Ram and is said to have a much faster clock speed than the Moto G2  I noticed a definite lag in app opening etc compared to the moto g2 which was definitely much faster.
Remaing all are as same as moto g2 
--------------------------------------------------------
delivery by flipkart  5
very bad delivery by flipkart this time.
Awesome delivery time by Flipkart.
First of a great delivery service by flipkart fro delivering the product in juast a day.
Got my MOTO G 3rd GEN phone on time and it was a good delivery by FLIPKART as usual .
--------------------------------------------------------
flipkart customer care  -5
It promotes and seIls a phone without having spares in stock I am completely frustrated by the response of its Customer care and other so called executives who have no clue how to handle or resolve a Customer issue .
Its my first time I m experiencing such a bad customer care support from Flipkart.
Motorola customer care worst.
Flipkart Customer Care tough to reach  
Only now I m realizing how bad their customer care is cs flipkart.
--------------------------------------------------------
at price range  -5
Still  I must mention that it is much better that phones in the same price range.
However today Acer launched a phone with a better configuration in this same price range  Acer Z630S .
Great camera  one of the best in this price range 
Just compare how much faster the zenphone 2 is at the same price range.
yeah  maybe some other brand may offer far more superior specification for the same price range or may be a little less.
Screen is not that sensitive if we compare with Windows from same price range.
I am using it from last 6 days and really feels that its a great phone in such price range in terms of build quality  camera  memory  storage space and most important water resistance.
--------------------------------------------------------
water resistant  -5
i used this product for 24 hours   after using i write my honest review   Moto G 3rd gen was a very premium phone loaded with new water resistant feature.
Though this is a water resistant mobile  I have not tested it.
Water resistant   wow.
1 battery backup is super cool I m able to access upto 19 hours without battery saver mode  loudspeaker is awesome and I don t feel any kind of disturbances  4G connectivity works fine  camera clarity is 101  better both in day and night  display is sturdy  touch functions excellently  design is good  my device doesn t get heated up Normally temp goes upto 37C  even i can able to play heavy games like Asphalt 8  Nova 3 and many more  water resistant feature works well  Flipkart now a days started selling refurbished products to the customer  so it s better to buy from Moto maker b coz we can select our own design and place the order  I had paid extra 2k INR to purchase from Moto maker and it took 10 days to ship the product to India from USA and another 3 days to deliver at my door step  Thankya Moto maker.
Water certainly goes inside the cover  but as it is water resistant  it does not enter the sealed phone.
it has also water resistant feature  not tested and had no wish getting tested on my device  but this feature surely helps you accidental fall of water on this device  the phone though a bit thick and heavy looks very stylish and compact specially the black one   in my opinion  .
Water resistant feature is great though i haven t yet tested.
3  Can t trust the water resistant mechanism as the back cover never covers the phone perfectly.
Smooth operations  nice GUI  specially what makes it best is water resistant and best look no phone in this range can beat this look .
Due to water resistant back case fully sealed .
It has corning gorilla glass 3 protection and also the phone is IPX7 rated which means it is water resistant upto 1 meter for 30 mins.
also water resistant overall super 
Motorola claims it to be water resistant and asking to check the back cover fitted properly  but its back cover is showing a big gap near the camera.
But it says that phone is water resistant only with back cover on.
Now to the phone  it has better processor  better RAM 2 GB   pure Android  13 MP very fast rear camera and water resistant features etc etc all this was known from specifications.
do not play with water resistant feature.
It is water resistant  i verified it.
Apart above two i would overall a worth to buy water resistant phone for 13k 
Water resistance  certainly a plus point  and indeed this is a good water resistant phone.
Motorola says phone is water resistant  If back cover is properly fit .
--------------------------------------------------------
in moto g3  5
really we are very satisfied with Moto Mobiles   waiting for next generation mobiles Moto G3.
In conclusion i ll give Moto G3 8.
CHecked with new Moto G3 Phone no lines at all .
All the variations in back cover and all customization options are not valid in India  No Motomaker yet so cant customize the G3 for free and the unique coloured back covers cost Rs.
I ve been using my moto g3 from past 3months .
I don t know how come MOTO G3 is getting such great reviews.
Heat management  now a days if u compare the phone like zenfone2 mi4 4i yureka  k3note heating problem is freely available  but compare to above one moto g3 heat management is good
Look for the original moto g3 flip cover  but its too expensive 
 Moto g3 is just rocking its simply outstanding.
But Moto G3 is very smooth  without lagging   hanging issue with 12.
Don t go purely with specs  it s ultimate user experience that counts and moto G3 is perfect in that area 
--------------------------------------------------------
for moto g3  4
really we are very satisfied with Moto Mobiles   waiting for next generation mobiles Moto G3.
Look for the original moto g3 flip cover  but its too expensive 
 i have buy a new moto g3 2 days before but today its hangs up and i cant understand what to do  
i have searched motorola users  forum and found that this bug is faced by lot of other moto g3 users globally and motorola has also acknowledged it.
For the product  Moto G3 was worth the price and it has done a nice job with quad core processor.
All the variations in back cover and all customization options are not valid in India  No Motomaker yet so cant customize the G3 for free and the unique coloured back covers cost Rs.
--------------------------------------------------------
hours  4
i used this product for 24 hours   after using i write my honest review   Moto G 3rd gen was a very premium phone loaded with new water resistant feature.
Also  if you intend to use Google maps for long hours with cellular data and GPS  it does get hot  after about 4 hours of continuous usage.
10 hours only with simple using like little bit browsing  photo clicks.
Battery seems to last for good 10 hours with mobile data or wifi on 
Besides that  the modest 720p resolution and the SD 410 mixed with 2500 mAh battery gave me a solid 6 hours on.
 i think i made a good choice of selecting a brand motorola 3rd gen  as i had earlier sony experia E  which is a hung phone  after initial use MOTO G 3 GEN for less than 24 hours feeling relieved  nice features  still time to go to check on heating  battery issues.
 Battery backup is very bad only 4 hours backup gives me at First Day.
heating issues and battery drains problems in the first 24 hours of use.
I am using this phone for last 24 hours  great phone.
It takes 2 45 minutes to charge from 0 to 100 with first 85  charged in just 2 hours.
4 Super Battery backup after full charge used Wifi music   others thing for continuous 5 hours   after that it s showing 70  available  
--------------------------------------------------------
for price range  -4
But acceptable for this price range.
 One best smartphone in its smart price range  Best to buy from slipkart for the timely delivery  Loved it  
Same display as 2nd gen. Rivals gives full HD panels for the same price range.
yeah  maybe some other brand may offer far more superior specification for the same price range or may be a little less.
--------------------------------------------------------
and moto g3  4
But out of all of these I prefer the Moto G3 the most due to its pure android experience.
 i have buy a new moto g3 2 days before but today its hangs up and i cant understand what to do  
 I bought moto g 1st gen on first day of its release  Feb6th 2013  and moto g3 also i bought on first day itself.
i have searched motorola users  forum and found that this bug is faced by lot of other moto g3 users globally and motorola has also acknowledged it.
For the product  Moto G3 was worth the price and it has done a nice job with quad core processor.
 Moto g3 is just rocking its simply outstanding.
All the variations in back cover and all customization options are not valid in India  No Motomaker yet so cant customize the G3 for free and the unique coloured back covers cost Rs.
Don t go purely with specs  it s ultimate user experience that counts and moto G3 is perfect in that area 
--------------------------------------------------------
in price range  -4
Still  I must mention that it is much better that phones in the same price range.
 One best smartphone in its smart price range  Best to buy from slipkart for the timely delivery  Loved it  
However today Acer launched a phone with a better configuration in this same price range  Acer Z630S .
Great camera  one of the best in this price range 
I am using it from last 6 days and really feels that its a great phone in such price range in terms of build quality  camera  memory  storage space and most important water resistance.
Screen is not that sensitive if we compare with Windows from same price range.
There are some other phones available in market within same price range  but I will definitely recommend it.
--------------------------------------------------------
moto e  3
Considering previous Moto G model performances  I decided to buy this  even if similar or better specs are available in the market at lower price.
20 Shake to start torch is a nice MOTO specific application is installed.
 It is very surprising that the moto g 3rd gen does not have a magnetometer especially when the moto g 2nd gen phone has a magnetometer 
It is clearly visible when I compared with other Moto G3 Device.
Overall  Moto G3 undoubtedly deserves a 4 out of 5  iff not more.
Overall good come up by moto 
I have a yellowish display when compared to one with other Moto g3.
2 Overall an average phone the Moto stupid company didnt provided Autofocus in it.
Hope Lenovo doesn t screw with us and keep Moto to be as original as possible.
I dont see much difference in camera as it looks same as MOTO G2 only the pixels increased and pics same as washed out like MOTO G2.
Initially  when i brought moto g2 I was very upset bcoz of battery backup.
Pick the 16GB one 8GB is really low on space and might cause issues  HAppy with my first moto.
i had already use moto g   moto e and moto e2   but this is CLASS .
resistant construction and deeper customization thanks to Moto Maker  this is undoubtedly the best designed Moto G to date in the series
Its same as moto g only different is back case and ram other or same.
 Guys i got the new moto g 3rd gen 16gb 2gb on friday aftr nun.
Heat management  now a days if u compare the phone like zenfone2 mi4 4i yureka  k3note heating problem is freely available  but compare to above one moto g3 heat management is good
But both having same size display moto is smaller in length  comfortable carrying inside pocket.
I was expecting so much about moto g 3rd gen.
I am still using the same moto g with no problems.
I miss the notification pulse light  as it was in my previous Moto G 1st Gen.
ALSO I bought original MOTO Flip cover worth Rs.
no issue with selling new moto set from cheeni itself .
If you want the old Moto G2 transparent like App Drawer background  you can use a KitKat based launcher and customize the UI look and feel.
please for next MOTO G camera should be prefect even you can charge 1000 Rs more also not a problem.
 i have buy a new moto g3 2 days before but today its hangs up and i cant understand what to do  
In conclusion i ll give Moto G3 8.
Moto s heavier and bigger  which means I m afraid of dropping it half the time.
Remaing all are as same as moto g2 
15 Moto display Its much better than LED notifications.
Notification LED is not present and Moto Assist doesnt seem to compensate the functionality of a Notification LED
I bought very first Moto G in my town in Feb 14.
I don t know how come MOTO G3 is getting such great reviews.
Have been an avid user of Palm Phones  Samsung and recently have been using Moto G 1st generation  switched to Lenovo Phones in between and but came back to the sturdy and stable Moto G. Acquired Moto G 3rd Genration this week from FlipKart.
The new Moto G offers a mostly stock Android 5.
Design  Its the same as Moto G2  nothing much new apart from back metallic strip with Moto logo.
Camera is better than previous moto Phones.
My old moto g is far far better till date even after 1 year usage it last a full day charge on 3g.
Moving data from my Samsung phone to the Moto G was fairly easy  though not complete  using Moto s app Migrate.
MOTO assist functions like double shaking for torch light and double twisting for camera works according to phones mood.
Go for samsung phones guys  moto is no better than any other chinese phone available in market 
I am very happy to have Moto G  3rd Generation .
I am planning to buy the next Moto G as well   
Build quality is not as impressive as Moto G2.
I have not understood Moto s Bluetooth completely.
CHecked with new Moto G3 Phone no lines at all .
The service station informed me that the spare parts are not available and as there was no information as to when it would be made available by Moto .
Not worthy comparing to Moto G2 apart from camera .
over all mobile is ok. Moto need to solve heating problem of mobile.
I still rember when Moto G 1st gen announced  It was a like a dream specs in very affordable price  That phone actually changed the smartphone market particularly in India  Every other company marched with their phones to challenge the classic Moto G  and lost the battle   
File explorer is not given as other moto   but it is not a factor you can download it from play store  ES FILE EXPLORER  according to me its a best one.
i have searched motorola users  forum and found that this bug is faced by lot of other moto g3 users globally and motorola has also acknowledged it.
do not buy this   go go for lenevo better than moto 
The color depth   details were so poor in moto display i felt like looking into a 90s salora Tv.
D To verify if the offer still exist  Add this phone and original Moto Flip Cover to your cart.
Speakers  Despite the single speaker on the Moto  it s extremely loud and clear in terms of the sound quality  Listening to music is a pleasure  particularly vocals.
 White colour looks dull when compare with moto e white  moto e looks bright for look.
really we are very satisfied with Moto Mobiles   waiting for next generation mobiles Moto G3.
Secondly  I exchanged my old Moto G1 for this Phone  so got a great discount too.
 filpkart they send me a moto g 3rd gen duplicate product  filpkart is trusted an orginal product  this is false my moto g pros noooooo cons  heating up to 45c normal use phone
Overall iam very much satisfied with Moto G3.
Video quality on the Moto is better than on the Xiaomi in my experience.
dear moto please dont bring new phone so early .
My first love  Moto G  became my obsession for its super looks and price.
with out using my mobile in stand by mood it is getting heat more  really i don t like this mobile moto g 3rd gen  totaly i am not happy 
 nice moto g3.
Heating Issues  The Moto heats up a little when charging  but apart from that it is completely free from heating of any kind.
The image quality of my moto e us better than the primary camera.
This is my very first Moto product which I have bought after my Sony Xperia.
3 Moto display Its much better than LED notifications  
Speaker is excellent and greater than Moto G2.
Camera  It is better than previous Moto G versions.
Look for the original moto g3 flip cover  but its too expensive 
 Phone overall is okay  though Moto G turbo would be the better choice now.
Exclusive Moto features 
I was completely satisfied with Moto G 1st Gen last year  which I used without a single problem till date.
--------------------------------------------------------
times  -3
Even though reporting and posting it several times to Flipkart customer service  I didn t get any response.
Battery   it is worst  I have to charge it 3 times daily
The phone is awesome except that certain times  the sound quality suddenly dips.
3 times after that it s wrking perfectly fine.
3 times i need to repeat it   which is very annoying
in calling voice is cutting by several times.
Two times i got message that product is cancelled by Seller and two times i got message that it will be delivered.
 good mobile under 10k nice mobile but lagging at some times nice battery poor processor but water and dust proof gaurenteed  
viberation not working 2 times i was give in service center which is authorised b2x located in dar east.
by several times.
So  at times  electrical contact is not made.
I contacted several times to Flipkart and everytime they keep on rejecting my request with some un.
It seems to let me transfer sometimes  and refuses at other times.
--------------------------------------------------------
replacement  -3
Contacted customer  they are not ready to return or replace the mobile  even though they put replacement as it has 30 days warranty.
So i took a replacement.
Then again requested for the Replacement  but the refused to give replacement and gave refund.
Will be happy if replacement effected at the time of picking defective product  as done in most of the cases.
It it intolerable  I requested a replacement within 1 hour of delivery .
Please look into the issue urgently and give me a replacement mobile instead of this defective piece delivered to me.
Ordered for a replacement see what happens next 
--------------------------------------------------------
good in hand  3
The phone is classy and looks quite stylish in looking and gives a very good in hand feel when you re using it.
and since this is a little bigger than that  I found good in hand.
--------------------------------------------------------
smooth  3
super smooth.
5. butter smooth touch
Performance is super smooth without lags.
The battery life is unbelieveable and super smooth.
Moreover the phone functioning is absolute smooth.
--------------------------------------------------------
corning gorilla glass  -3
The gorilla glass is also good as I am not using any screenguard since my purchase and not a single scratch is there in the screen till now.
After using it 20 days believe me touch glass broken automatically.
but heating  sar value no gorrila glass cheap quality plastic used.
Gorilla glass is not really helpful.
Gorilla glass is good and no screen guard should be required.
It has a so called  Gorilla  glass which cracks when dropped accidently from 2.
I got Moto G 3rd Generation  with Gorilla glass 3 which is non breakable and damage free.
stock android experience very handy  nice camera with dual led tone flash light speaker and earphn both are in front gorilla glass and water resistence.
and it fell once from my hand and the screen is already cracked  wasn t the screen supposed to be a Corning Gorilla Glass 3  a very sturdy glass 
Second  the glass is fragile albeit being Gorilla It s brilliant but it s fragile.
the product was good at the start and the gorilla glass is not so hard it is so delicate and it broken jst fell from a small height even with glass protection and the motrola service centre kept my mobile more than 2 month at the service centre and stil the repair was not done and the answer from the service centre side is the spare parts are not available with the motorola and again i went outside and placed local dispaly which again had a crack and now the software is also corrupted and the service centre people says the device wil not fell under warranty so they wont update the software for free and they wil charge the amount.
When asked customer care folks they said its Gorilla glass and its common  its not a problem.
Corning gorrila glass 3 is good.
 Every thing is fine except Glass when it drop from 2 feet height total glass has gone two days back gave in service center they saying it costs 6000 i took this phone my friend now he is unsatisfied   glass cost saying 6000  what is this   
I was using a good quality tempered glass as well with this phone but still the screen got cracked and the tempered glass was fine.
 the Gorilla glass is not good it causes to scratch  and my black back shell becomes a dark green colour.
--------------------------------------------------------
though  3
Back cover  though is very good  white coloured ones can get dirty easily
i had a moto g2  this definately feels like an upgrade  marginal though.
--------------------------------------------------------
slow motion video  -3
 Battery Life is awesome  after a full charge and using for 5 hours with browsing on Wifi  downloading apps and few clicks with cam and 3 slow motion video and whatsapp  battery is still at 80 
2 Slow motion video  awesome one .
Native app allowing slow motion video recording is a plus.
--------------------------------------------------------
g 3rd generation  -3
Low Pixel density   Motorola should have worked on it  Even The Display of Moto G 1st generation is sharper than 3rd generation. 
I have using Moto G 1st generation from last 18 months and now i got this new New Moto G 3rd generation.
i am not so happy with this phone the screen is not so good look wise you will get when you buy it and yourslef see it i buyed this phone nad when i see it the first thought in my mind comes is that i should buy moto g 2nd generation its better than 3rd one but now i am not so happy with this phone when i play heavy games its get heat up motorola company plz do look on my review and do something for this phone  
G 3rd generation to be delivered at the earliest.
As i buy moto g  3rd generation  because of 13 mega pixcel camera but camera is not good.
--------------------------------------------------------
well  -3
The new well designed back cover makes it easy to hold and gives a much more premium finish to the phone.
 Overall its a well balanced decent device and Its worth for Rs.
--------------------------------------------------------
2 3 days  -2
 With lot of faith and waiting several days purchased Moto G3 two days ago.
Within 3 days of usage  the very purpose to have phone is defeated as I am not able to listen other person on the phone due to interference noise  signal drop  voice clarity issues.
If full charged it ends for 2 days at least with some hours gaming and wifi on full day.
I have been using it for the past 20 days and so far  no lags wat so ever.
Battery life is good  can last for two days with my form of average usage  few calls  mails  WhatsApp  3G is always on  an hour or two of light gaming  few snaps and social networking roughly 2.
I got a new MotoG3 2 days ago and am happy with all the features that is available in the phone.
I am using this mobile since 33 days.
From last 3 days i am writing mails to FLIPKART  they told me to pay rs 10 000 and get it done.
3 days new apps update is available on play store .
From the past 2 days  the network seems connected but people are unable to reach my number and the IVR notifies them that my number is out of coverage area   not reachable and then I get texts that the conatcts have tried reaching me and it is a missed call.
--------------------------------------------------------
matte finish  2
built quality  it appears great  ita matte finish gives it premium look.
--------------------------------------------------------
pros and cons  -2
Pros  good camera  good call quality 
so  here are its little cons . 
 No comments  PERFECT  not a single cons to mention
Though Display Is Still Very good  So These won t be the major cons And Motorola had to keep the price low So that s maybe the reason of that.
no other cons.
I would just like to point out the pros and cons in short.
Apart from that I haven t found any cons as such.
P. S. So you can see that not much Cons you get from this device.
--------------------------------------------------------
quad core processor  2
4GHz Quad Core processor are good enough for most of the operations
Speed  With 2 GB RAM and a powerful quad core processor this phone is a beast.
Performance  2GB RAM and Quad Core processor are working at its best.
Pros  Leaving aside the mess which is called Lollipop and what it did to the Moto UI  from Kitkat  the phone is a powerhouse  It has a good quad core processor  Super 2GB RAM  13 MP back and 5 MP front camera  dual flash  water resistance  4g LTE which are some noticeable feature from its predecessor Moto G2.
--------------------------------------------------------
thanks to flipkart  2
Best build quality strong and premium  thanks FLIPKART 
Thanks to Flipkart for such a fantastic timing.
i purchased this product on 3rd august 2015. thanks for the flipkart s one day delivery.
special thanks to flipkart for delivery before time.
Internet surfing   Internet surfing experience was quite smooth  thanks to Quad.
Thanks for fast flipkart service  but I paid extra 90 rs for I day delivery.
First my warm thanks for the delivery flipkart 
My son is going to use this device and he always want to have MOTO G 3 only   So he must be happy now   Thanks Flipkart and 5 star rating is only to appreciate your customer team  
--------------------------------------------------------
g 3rd gen  -2
As i buy moto g  3rd generation  because of 13 mega pixcel camera but camera is not good.
 i think i made a good choice of selecting a brand motorola 3rd gen  as i had earlier sony experia E  which is a hung phone  after initial use MOTO G 3 GEN for less than 24 hours feeling relieved  nice features  still time to go to check on heating  battery issues.
3rd gen looks flat.
I am just little bored with the look as my old Nexus 4 and Moto g 3rd gen looks very similar.
Got the Moto G first gen last year  the moto x   Moto e 2nd gen and now the Moto G 3rd gen.
The previous g 1 and g2 were far better then the 3rd gen.
--------------------------------------------------------
g 2nd gen  2
The 410 is a very old chipset not much of an upgrade from the previous gen Moto G  same hardware is there in Moto E 2nd gen. 7.
Got the Moto G first gen last year  the moto x   Moto e 2nd gen and now the Moto G 3rd gen.
 compared to 2nd gen mobile  no much difference than waterproof and updation of camera.
--------------------------------------------------------
no led notification  -2
There is no led notification light for message call alert.
Everything is perfect except no LED notification  which is very basic but a necessary feature in mobiles.
--------------------------------------------------------
to service center  -2
15  and 4 days back when i checked my mobile  plastic of top speaker torn  immediately i mail to FLIKART  they told me go to moto authorised service center  the guy at service center told me that it can not be done  because the plastic is a part of display and you have to change whole display and the cost of display is around 10 000 .
They have rejected my replacement request and asked me to visit nearby service center.
phone is superb but service center is worst 
I bought the cell a month ago  apparently because of the moto branding thinking after purchase service is good  but all i have is regret the cell discharges quick  the browser often hangs  the MX player too freezes sometimes playing in H W mode  glass is not as expected  got broken and the service center told me i have to pay 4K for that moreover i was told it will be taking minimum of 10 days  working days  to get it repaired and that too was an approximate date as the part was not readily available  i tried getting the issue resolved with customer care to my surprise he added to my misery by saying that it will take 15 days rather than 10  i explained i just got the cell 1 month back there should be some liability at company s end but i was explained that the warranty was only applicable to software not hardware and i have to pay the 4K after that they will look into it but still the time estimating didn t came down from 15 days.
And worst and very rude service by moto service centers and customer care.
I have asked other customers coming on motorola service center and major of them having same issue in moto G  and E. Looking for some solution for this problem other wise planning to return handset and buy some other good smartphone in same range.
viberation not working 2 times i was give in service center which is authorised b2x located in dar east.
then took it to the authorised service center and they said its bcose of some software problem.
bad service ever i seen from Motorola authorized service center 
 I have purchase this phone and when i receive the same after that i tried to connect in wifi its not working  After that i went to service center in Ahmedabad and they have tried to do the same finally they update software after that it was working in their office wifi.
--------------------------------------------------------
day to day  -2
First I had moto G 2014 already  I ordered this new one today and got same day delivery as flipkart first customer.
I tried calling Customer Executive since that day every other day and started writing mail to know what are the discrepancies in the process and how long time will take.
Zenfone 2 with 3000 mAh battery struggles to last a day in real life.
Phone is really fast  Battery will give you a full day to charge it again.
Next day before reaching to office phone was delivered.
4. battery life is too good it works whole day without charging.
Next day got a call from customer support asking why i request a return.
In the league of smartphones  where every other day a new company comes up with new features and attractive prices  I must tell you Moto series from Motorola has made its own league  which is way different from the other handset manufacturers.
 Using Moto G 3rd Gen for a day now  and pretty much satisfied to say the least.
 First of all thanks to flipkart for free in a day delivery.
Battery in half day continuous use has gone down 50  too early comment about how will it fare after few months and regular use.
 I bought moto g 1st gen on first day of its release  Feb6th 2013  and moto g3 also i bought on first day itself.
The battery worked an entire day from 9 am until about 11 30 pm when it switched to batter saver mode  not drained out  with a pretty high usage of WiFi  BT with about 5 hours of screen time 
Might just need it if you are out the whole day and shy to plug in your phone at public places.
Able to stand 1 full day.
battery easily lasts upto a full day mix usage .
The next day  I placed an order for Moto G  Gen 3  on Flipkart.
Battery  The battery on the Moto G can last easily over a day  but it would be wrong to expect more of the 2470mAh battery.
My old moto g is far far better till date even after 1 year usage it last a full day charge on 3g.
2470 Mah battery is little bit lower than expectation  but good enough to last whole day with medium usage
and then i compalint about flipkart and blue dart courier service than on next day in heavy rain they ran and came to me with product.
With 2450 mAh battery it lasts a full day with medium to heavy usage.
--------------------------------------------------------
samsung  2
It s better than Samsung galaxy J5 and Xaomi MI4i in many ways  
No regrets  it is faaar better than my samsung Galaxy Grand duos.
8. earphone is not like samsung and others .
Not usable with my Samsung Smart TV
I found UI of samsung more friendly but this is not really a con and may be i am not used to motorola UI   
That s y shifted to Samsung from being loyal to moto past almost 3 years.
Better than Samsung 
Also am not a geek or very tech savvy to root my old samsung ph.
j5 samsung is much better than this comparingly 
Samsung grand 2 used to get heated up like an oven 
--------------------------------------------------------
and moto g  2
with out using my mobile in stand by mood it is getting heat more  really i don t like this mobile moto g 3rd gen  totaly i am not happy 
If you want the old Moto G2 transparent like App Drawer background  you can use a KitKat based launcher and customize the UI look and feel.
 i have buy a new moto g3 2 days before but today its hangs up and i cant understand what to do  
I dont see much difference in camera as it looks same as MOTO G2 only the pixels increased and pics same as washed out like MOTO G2.
Moto s heavier and bigger  which means I m afraid of dropping it half the time.
Hope Lenovo doesn t screw with us and keep Moto to be as original as possible.
MOTO assist functions like double shaking for torch light and double twisting for camera works according to phones mood.
Pick the 16GB one 8GB is really low on space and might cause issues  HAppy with my first moto.
i had already use moto g   moto e and moto e2   but this is CLASS .
I still rember when Moto G 1st gen announced  It was a like a dream specs in very affordable price  That phone actually changed the smartphone market particularly in India  Every other company marched with their phones to challenge the classic Moto G  and lost the battle   
resistant construction and deeper customization thanks to Moto Maker  this is undoubtedly the best designed Moto G to date in the series
Its same as moto g only different is back case and ram other or same.
Have been an avid user of Palm Phones  Samsung and recently have been using Moto G 1st generation  switched to Lenovo Phones in between and but came back to the sturdy and stable Moto G. Acquired Moto G 3rd Genration this week from FlipKart.
Speaker is excellent and greater than Moto G2.
The new Moto G offers a mostly stock Android 5.
i have searched motorola users  forum and found that this bug is faced by lot of other moto g3 users globally and motorola has also acknowledged it.
My first love  Moto G  became my obsession for its super looks and price.
D To verify if the offer still exist  Add this phone and original Moto Flip Cover to your cart.
Speakers  Despite the single speaker on the Moto  it s extremely loud and clear in terms of the sound quality  Listening to music is a pleasure  particularly vocals.
--------------------------------------------------------
modern combat  1
This phone can hold its on while playing all kinds of heavy games like asphalt 8 at high settings and modern combat 5.
--------------------------------------------------------
social networking  1
Multitasking is very fluent with all basic social networking running backend.
Battery life is good  can last for two days with my form of average usage  few calls  mails  WhatsApp  3G is always on  an hour or two of light gaming  few snaps and social networking roughly 2.
Multitasking is very fluent with all basic social networking running backend  RAM 2GB that one is awesome.
--------------------------------------------------------
bla bla  1
same bla bla bla explaing issue  till the time I get frustrate and not getting satisfied reply  I asked to transfer phone to their main Management people Seniors so that I can get some true information about the issue.
--------------------------------------------------------
lenovo k3 note  -1
Much better than k3 note and mi4i.
 i used recently lenovo k3 note after that i used this phone but this device call voice quality is very poor k3 note is best i cant except from Motorola to compromise the quality 
Much better than lenovok3 note.
Nice screen with Gorilla glass  not FHD like K3 Note but its good.
--------------------------------------------------------
back cover  1
And service centre confirmed that back cover is fine.
If you visit their service centre and request to check if back cover is proper so that water will not go in.
I love the new patterned look on the back cover   the new camera housing design.
All the variations in back cover and all customization options are not valid in India  No Motomaker yet so cant customize the G3 for free and the unique coloured back covers cost Rs.
while water testing if under great pressure from taps or if back cover is loose then water enters inside then you could face these problems which many are facings right now.
Motorola says phone is water resistant  If back cover is properly fit .
The back cover makes the phone grip handy  comfortable and easy to use.
Quality of plastic used in the back cover is good.
But it says that phone is water resistant only with back cover on.
The new well designed back cover makes it easy to hold and gives a much more premium finish to the phone.
Good back cover.
Stock Android OS is butter smooth to use  the screen is brilliant and the back cover looks amazingly premium.
The second con I may mention is that whenever you dip your phone in water completely  whether or not accidently  you have to remove the back cover safely at some other time and dry it.
Good back cover
Awsome phone but the back cover appears to be slight yellowish which makes the phone to look old.
Back cover is difficult to remove.
But Moto G3 Flip cover is very high priced.
But i didnt like the Back cover which i purchased along with this phone.
Good built  especially the back cover providing a firm grip.
They say it is not guaranteed that water will not go in even if cover is fit.
Flip cover is useless  as it makes ur phone gestures useless and also Map navigation is lost due to magnet in flip cover.
Motorola claims it to be water resistant and asking to check the back cover fitted properly  but its back cover is showing a big gap near the camera.
Look for the original moto g3 flip cover  but its too expensive 
Build quality is very good   material used is of good quality and good finishing  slim piece  back cover is attractive as well as designed such as it maintains grip in the hand. 
Original Flip Cover AVAILABLE  You cannot use duplicate flip cover  one that replaces original back lid  because your phone will no longer be water proof.
There is not enough grip on back cover.
--------------------------------------------------------
screen on time  1
Don t get me wrong in normal usage you won t feel any heating problem on this device but when i play asphalt 8 for a long time the screen panel do heats a little.
While clicking pics on front cam  the transition time of a second when your picture is previewed  the screen turns sepia.
5 hrs of screen on time which is decent.
The touch screen doesn t function under water  I tried to use a remote and timer to capture photo under water  but there was a problem in focussing.
Other options of going for duplicate screen replacement at local shops is not available for this MOTO G. It is hard to find Moto G service centres near by  and even if you find one  they will keep the mobile with them for very very long time  and you would just have to ask them again and again  which could be a frustrating experience.
--------------------------------------------------------
13 mp  1
Pros  Leaving aside the mess which is called Lollipop and what it did to the Moto UI  from Kitkat  the phone is a powerhouse  It has a good quad core processor  Super 2GB RAM  13 MP back and 5 MP front camera  dual flash  water resistance  4g LTE which are some noticeable feature from its predecessor Moto G2.
Camera  It has a 13 MP primary camera and 5 MP front camera.
It comes with new version of ios  Next version will be upgradebal   Camera is also good 13 mp  it will beat mi4i  front camera 5 mp is also for selfi lover.
defect is the screen scrolls on its own when u tap it  not always but most of the times   this problem is with all moto g3  i had to change two moto g3 to find out this problem  and the camera is very bad  it is not like 13 mp  for name sake it is 13mp  doesn t feel like one.
13 MP rear cam   5 MP front cam does a wonderful job.
7  The cameras  both 13MP   5 MP  are really good and fast in taking pics.
--------------------------------------------------------
games  -1
1 battery backup is super cool I m able to access upto 19 hours without battery saver mode  loudspeaker is awesome and I don t feel any kind of disturbances  4G connectivity works fine  camera clarity is 101  better both in day and night  display is sturdy  touch functions excellently  design is good  my device doesn t get heated up Normally temp goes upto 37C  even i can able to play heavy games like Asphalt 8  Nova 3 and many more  water resistant feature works well  Flipkart now a days started selling refurbished products to the customer  so it s better to buy from Moto maker b coz we can select our own design and place the order  I had paid extra 2k INR to purchase from Moto maker and it took 10 days to ship the product to India from USA and another 3 days to deliver at my door step  Thankya Moto maker.
6. processor is good and i think lag problem with big heavy games willl end 
Many graphically intensive games may not be playable.
36ghz quad core we can say somewhat decent one but to run the stock os and heavy apps n games it is good 
Phone comes with 2gb ram  so no hanging problem even large games can play with ease but camera quality is not so good.
i am not so happy with this phone the screen is not so good look wise you will get when you buy it and yourslef see it i buyed this phone nad when i see it the first thought in my mind comes is that i should buy moto g 2nd generation its better than 3rd one but now i am not so happy with this phone when i play heavy games its get heat up motorola company plz do look on my review and do something for this phone  
This phone can hold its on while playing all kinds of heavy games like asphalt 8 at high settings and modern combat 5.
This phone is optimized for heavy intensive gaming  I ran games like Modern combat 5  Gangster Vegas  asphalt 8 airborne  brothers in arms 3 Mortal Combat  Batman Arkham city.
phone performance is good camera is good over all battery backup is not good if you are playing some games display is good .
Gaming   the phone has ample processing power for standard games but not suitable for high end 3D graphics 
Though heavy games are not recommended for this phone  it is able to handle them very well.
Used phone just for 15 mins  played some lower end games like Temple run and other simple games    not HD games  this phone got heated like anything 
but while playing very high games you will observe some frame drops 
this phone have not much better result when we are playing a game just like Subway Surfers  temple run   I am talking these common games who are running without any interruption or hanging on very common moblie phone.
Its able to run most the graphics demanding games due to the optimization between the display 5  HD  with 294ppi  and the adreno 306 GPU.
Gaming   I dont use much of the games .
can played almost all the heavy games in the market.
Flipkart delivery was amazing  The UI is smooth  games run without any lags  sound quality is fine although the in.
Runs heavy games smoothly  mainly due to the 2 GB RAM.
Gaming  Game play is smooth for graphic hungry games such as Asphalt 8 etc.
Although it doesn t get warm or hot due to normal usage  playing very heavy games like Asphalt 8  Shadow fight 2  Leo s Fortune for more than an hour gets it heated up a little.
5  Games are lag free and the the touch is Awesome with a capital  A .
I used to face a lag for certain large games on he G1 but don t seem to face any of that on this phone yet.
While playing certain games i noticed navigation buttons don t disappear  so u can accidently touch them and taken on Homescreen which is annoying.
--------------------------------------------------------
apps  -1
better than expected  fast  water proof  stock android the best  no useless apps pre installed.
Operation is smooth  you can work with various apps simultaneously and it wont disappoint.
800 Ram for other apps.
It allows a great no of apps from google store.
but in prev moto g s the app starts from beging when i switch apps
36ghz quad core we can say somewhat decent one but to run the stock os and heavy apps n games it is good 
The booting is incredibly fast  the apps are running very smooth and another very good feature is the awesome touch screen.
No lag whatsoever  no bloatware  no extra apps pre.
OS is pretty stable  though the device tend to turn hot while running heavy apps for prolonged duration
very great lollipop  no other apps installed easy to use.
I was not able to install any apps from the playstore.
For heavy apps user like me 11gb is not sufficient  
Apps open smoothly and fairly quickly.
The phone comes with very much basic apps and features.
I found the Moto to be slightly snappier  with 18 apps running  when compared to the Mi 4i  with 6 apps running  but the difference might be too minor to notice in day.
moto apps are pretty helpful.
3 windows of apps already open when i switched on the phone.
And  because of plain lollipop without a layer of UI and apps added by manufacturer  runs smooth  leaves plenty of RAM for other apps and is light on battery as well 
Very smooth and least cluttered with apps.
 Its good and having some better apps it has good battery capcity  
--------------------------------------------------------
watch movies  1
The viewing angles are excellent which makes better to watch movies and videos.
--------------------------------------------------------
at price point  1
But atleast you get one  unlike certain other phones at similar price points.
--------------------------------------------------------
excellent  1
Good excellent handset.
--------------------------------------------------------
with 2gb ram  1
Coming to the RAM which was Upgraded in this Model which comes with 2GB RAM is just perfect with the Times  2015  and the phone never Lagged for me.
2. hardware snapdragon 410 has a decent power management and performance while the 2gb ram is quite powerful that gives the device to run in such a nice and smooth ui without any hiccups.
Rember other 2GB phones in the market like Zenfone2 running on its Zen UI  K3 note with its Vibe UI are filled with bloatwares and a little RAM will be free at any time.
Equipped with 2GB RAM which is apt  or best  for stock android.
2GB  but only 600MB is used by system  in other mobiles 1GB is atleast used by system  so motog with 2GB ram and other with 3GB ram is equivalent since the free memory is 1GB .
--------------------------------------------------------
water proof  1
Agreed that neither does it provide full water proofing but never mind  I don t plan to use my phone while swimming.
Gorilla glass and water proof is good 
better than expected  fast  water proof  stock android the best  no useless apps pre installed.
Best phone under 10000 water proof best camera nice looking solid phone love moto 
2 even though moto says waterproof water gets into the backcover even if spill a little.
Water resistance  Rember  it s not dust proof  
--------------------------------------------------------
of moto g3  -1
Overall  Moto G3 undoubtedly deserves a 4 out of 5  iff not more.
 I bought moto g 1st gen on first day of its release  Feb6th 2013  and moto g3 also i bought on first day itself.
But out of all of these I prefer the Moto G3 the most due to its pure android experience.
 Happy to be a owner of moto g3  black .
i have searched motorola users  forum and found that this bug is faced by lot of other moto g3 users globally and motorola has also acknowledged it.
--------------------------------------------------------
service centre  1
the product was good at the start and the gorilla glass is not so hard it is so delicate and it broken jst fell from a small height even with glass protection and the motrola service centre kept my mobile more than 2 month at the service centre and stil the repair was not done and the answer from the service centre side is the spare parts are not available with the motorola and again i went outside and placed local dispaly which again had a crack and now the software is also corrupted and the service centre people says the device wil not fell under warranty so they wont update the software for free and they wil charge the amount.
Product Quality is bad and after sales service is worst  since 21 days my device is with Service Centre for repair and till date i dont have any updated from Motorola and B2X Service Centre after many time i had followup for the same issue.
and the disappointing part is that there are not any authorized service centre of motorola in Jamshedpur which is making my life even more difficult.
--------------------------------------------------------
need  1
4 battery charging time is too long u need to wait for 3 hours 
off purpose  then I will say  blindly go for it  no need to give a second thought.
Battery   battery usage is pretty good  need to use the phone for a longer period to rate this.
--------------------------------------------------------
in moto g  -1
Considering previous Moto G model performances  I decided to buy this  even if similar or better specs are available in the market at lower price.
 It is very surprising that the moto g 3rd gen does not have a magnetometer especially when the moto g 2nd gen phone has a magnetometer 
I bought moto g last year when motorola phones were launched in India.
2 Overall an average phone the Moto stupid company didnt provided Autofocus in it.
Hope Lenovo doesn t screw with us and keep Moto to be as original as possible.
Initially  when i brought moto g2 I was very upset bcoz of battery backup.
The 410 is a very old chipset not much of an upgrade from the previous gen Moto G  same hardware is there in Moto E 2nd gen. 7.
resistant construction and deeper customization thanks to Moto Maker  this is undoubtedly the best designed Moto G to date in the series
I was expecting so much about moto g 3rd gen.
I am still using the same moto g with no problems.
I miss the notification pulse light  as it was in my previous Moto G 1st Gen.
ALSO I bought original MOTO Flip cover worth Rs.
no issue with selling new moto set from cheeni itself .
In conclusion i ll give Moto G3 8.
Moto s heavier and bigger  which means I m afraid of dropping it half the time.
I bought very first Moto G in my town in Feb 14.
I don t know how come MOTO G3 is getting such great reviews.
Have been an avid user of Palm Phones  Samsung and recently have been using Moto G 1st generation  switched to Lenovo Phones in between and but came back to the sturdy and stable Moto G. Acquired Moto G 3rd Genration this week from FlipKart.
Design  Its the same as Moto G2  nothing much new apart from back metallic strip with Moto logo.
Moving data from my Samsung phone to the Moto G was fairly easy  though not complete  using Moto s app Migrate.
MOTO assist functions like double shaking for torch light and double twisting for camera works according to phones mood.
Go for samsung phones guys  moto is no better than any other chinese phone available in market 
I am planning to buy the next Moto G as well   
with out using my mobile in stand by mood it is getting heat more  really i don t like this mobile moto g 3rd gen  totaly i am not happy 
CHecked with new Moto G3 Phone no lines at all .
Not worthy comparing to Moto G2 apart from camera .
over all mobile is ok. Moto need to solve heating problem of mobile.
I still rember when Moto G 1st gen announced  It was a like a dream specs in very affordable price  That phone actually changed the smartphone market particularly in India  Every other company marched with their phones to challenge the classic Moto G  and lost the battle   
File explorer is not given as other moto   but it is not a factor you can download it from play store  ES FILE EXPLORER  according to me its a best one.
Heat management  now a days if u compare the phone like zenfone2 mi4 4i yureka  k3note heating problem is freely available  but compare to above one moto g3 heat management is good
The color depth   details were so poor in moto display i felt like looking into a 90s salora Tv.
D To verify if the offer still exist  Add this phone and original Moto Flip Cover to your cart.
Speakers  Despite the single speaker on the Moto  it s extremely loud and clear in terms of the sound quality  Listening to music is a pleasure  particularly vocals.
really we are very satisfied with Moto Mobiles   waiting for next generation mobiles Moto G3.
 filpkart they send me a moto g 3rd gen duplicate product  filpkart is trusted an orginal product  this is false my moto g pros noooooo cons  heating up to 45c normal use phone
In my opinion moto g is the best in this price range.
dear moto please dont bring new phone so early .
I upgraded to a moto g3 16 G smart ph after using using samung ace phone for 4.
To sum up  Moto G looks good on papers with flashy specs but dissapoints on quality parameters.
Heating Issues  The Moto heats up a little when charging  but apart from that it is completely free from heating of any kind.
But both having same size display moto is smaller in length  comfortable carrying inside pocket.
I dont see much difference in camera as it looks same as MOTO G2 only the pixels increased and pics same as washed out like MOTO G2.
Look for the original moto g3 flip cover  but its too expensive 
Remaing all are as same as moto g2 
I was completely satisfied with Moto G 1st Gen last year  which I used without a single problem till date.
--------------------------------------------------------
user  -1
This is b the best phone for those who want a good user experience.
4. battery backup is good  not applicable for heavy user 
I m a new user of Motorola.
 Moto G  3rd gen  is a perfectly build smartphone with a hassle free user experience.
I am an average user.
i would definitely recommend this smartphone to anyone who is a moderate user.
I took this phone for my dad who is a moderate user.
mellow but its is not that much user friendly
Overall I had a good user experience with this phone since the past couple of days.
Have been an avid user of Palm Phones  Samsung and recently have been using Moto G 1st generation  switched to Lenovo Phones in between and but came back to the sturdy and stable Moto G. Acquired Moto G 3rd Genration this week from FlipKart.
5. good user interface.
Gud mobile  nice to use it  it was really awesome  and gud user friendly mobile 
Concluding  I would personally advice you to go for this only if you re a casual user and not a heavy one.
Don t go purely with specs  it s ultimate user experience that counts and moto G3 is perfect in that area 
--------------------------------------------------------
form factor  1
Form Factor  The form factor is better than Moto G 2nd Generation  the grip is better and the screen is slightly wider  enabling a better view.